Journal Artificial Intelligence Research 57 (2016) 509-572

Submitted November, 2015; published November, 2016

Survey Computational Treatments Biomolecules
Robotics-Inspired Methods
Modeling Equilibrium Structure Dynamics
Amarda Shehu

AMARDA @ GMU . EDU

Department Computer Science, Department Bioengineering,
School Systems Biology
George Mason University, Fairfax, VA, USA

Erion Plaku

PLAKU @ CUA . EDU

Department Electrical Engineering Computer Science
Catholic University America, Washington, DC, USA

Abstract
fifty years research molecular biology demonstrated ability
small large molecules interact one another propagate cellular processes
living cell lies ability molecules assume switch specific structures
physiological conditions. Elucidating biomolecular structure dynamics equilibrium
therefore fundamental furthering understanding biological function, molecular mechanisms cell, biology, disease, disease treatments. now, wealth
methods designed elucidate biomolecular structure dynamics contributed diverse
scientific communities. survey, focus recent methods contributed Robotics
community promise address outstanding challenges regarding disparate length time
scales characterize dynamic molecular processes cell. particular, survey roboticsinspired methods designed obtain efficient representations structure spaces molecules isolation assemblies purpose characterizing equilibrium structure dynamics.
exhaustive review impossible endeavor, survey balances description important
algorithmic contributions critical discussion outstanding computational challenges.
objective spur research address outstanding challenges modeling equilibrium
biomolecular structure dynamics.

1. Introduction
way chain amino acid units protein molecule coiled folded space
worked first time. protein myoglobin, molecule contains
2,600 atoms. John Kendrew began feature article Scientific American 1961,
reporting first atomistic model protein structure1 obtained via X-ray crystallography (Kendrew, Dickerson, Strandberg, Hart, Davies, Phillips, & Shore, 1960). model drawn
various graphical representations Figure 1. pioneering work resolving structures
globular proteins, Kendrew Perutz awarded Nobel Prize chemistry 1962.
year Watson, Crick, Wilkins shared Nobel Prize physiology medicine
using X-ray crystallography data determine helical structure DNA.
1. purpose survey, distinguish structure conformation. Structure refer
specific placement atoms comprise biomolecule R3 . concept conformation defined
Section 2.
c
2016
AI Access Foundation. rights reserved.

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

(a) X-ray model myoglobin heme group

(b) Model atomistic detail (no heme group)

(c) Various models myoglobin heme group
Figure 1: (a) X-ray model myoglobin heme group bound determined Kendrew
drawn Visual Molecular Dynamics (VMD) software (Humphrey et al., 1996). model
found Protein Data Bank (PDB) (Berman et al., 2003), repository known protein structures,
PDB entry 1MBN. Drawing surface protein facilitates visually locating cavity
heme group, helps myoglobin carry oxygen tissue, binds. heme group drawn
ball-and-stick representation red. (b) heavy atoms comprise 153-amino acid long myoglobin
chain drawn ball-and-stick representation, color-coded amino acid belong.
backbone connects atoms consecutive amino acids chain drawn white NewCartoon
representation VMD. (c) X-ray model myoglobin PDB entry 1MBN superimposed 12
models obtained protein bound heme group Nuclear Magnetic Resonance (NMR),
deposited PDB PDB entry 1MYF.

ability visualize structures biomolecules atomistic detail shot arm
molecular biology marked beginning revolution molecular structural biology; race
soon ensued across wet laboratories determine three-dimensional (3d) structures assumed proteins biomolecules physiological conditions. Since early days, set protein structures resolved wet-laboratory, beginning myoglobin lysozyme (Kendrew,
Bodo, Dintzis, Parrish, Wyckoff, & Phillips, 1958; Kendrew et al., 1960; Phillips, 1967), grown
510

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

hundred thousand, freely available anyone download PDB (Berman
et al., 2003).
pioneering work Anfinsen, earned Nobel Prize Chemistry 1973,
demonstrated ability protein carry biological function dependent
ability fold onto specific 3d structure reversibly (Anfinsen, 1973). Anfinsen experiments
led view folded structure corresponds global minimum underlying energy
surface. showed information needed protein assume 3d, biologicallyactive structure largely encoded amino-acid sequence. Since then, study biomolecular
function consider role sequence structure (Fersht, 1999).
Figure 1(a), shows surface biologically-active structure myoglobin protein, exposes central cavity allows binding heme group myoglobin. Figure 1(b)
traces amino-acid chain makes myoglobin additionally draws heavy atoms constituting amino acid protein. simple images illustrate two important points: first,
structure plays central role function (specifically, complementary geometric physicochemical features 3d structures molecules key stable molecular interactions) (Boehr &
Wright, 2008); second, ability amino-acid chain fold onto makes protein
structures complex. Understanding biologically-active structure biomolecule assumes cell key elucidating molecular mechanisms healthy diseased
cell, determining address abnormal role biomolecule mechanisms
order treat disease. particular, research shown many abnormalities involve proteins aberrant biological function (Soto, 2008; Uversky, 2009; Fernandez-Medarde & Santos,
2011; Neudecker, Robustelli, Cavalli, Walsh, Lundstrm, Zarrine-Afsar, Sharpe, Vendruscolo, &
Kay, 2012) due external internal perturbations (e.g., DNA mutations, copying errors) affecting ability molecules assume specific structures (Onuchic, Luthey-Schulten, &
Wolynes, 1997; Ozenne, Schneider, Yao, Huang, Salmon, Zweckstetter, Jensen, & Blackledge,
2012; Levy, Jortner, & Becker, 2001; Miao, Sinko, Pierce, Bucher, Walker, & McCammon, 2014;
Gorfe, Grant, & McCammon, 2008; Grant, Gorfe, & McCammon, 2009).
treatment relationship structure function would incomplete
dynamic personality biomolecules taken account (Jenzler-Wildman & Kern, 2007).
X-ray models biomolecular structures seem suggest rigid molecules atoms frozen
space, increasing number wet-laboratory, theoretical, computational studies shown
biomolecules systems particles perpetual motion. Indeed, Feynman taught early
jiggling wiggling atoms (Feynman, Leighton, & Sands, 1963). Cooper others later
posited inherent dynamics biomolecules could explained general, theoretical
treatment molecules thermodynamic systems striving towards equilibrium, lowest freeenergy state (Cooper, 1984). Thus, inherent dynamics biomolecules could explained
using fundamental physics principles; statistical mechanics formulation revealed inherent
uncertainty given time particular state molecule (Cooper, 1984).
dynamics molecular systems investigated around time first experimental
models protein structures emerging. 1967, Verlet simulated dynamics argon
demonstrated simulations able reproduce equilibrium properties (Verlet, 1967).
Application Verlet algorithm simulating protein dynamics would wait one
decade. 1977, McCammon Karplus reported 9.2 picosecond-long trajectory showing in-vacuum, atomistic fluctuations bovine pancreatic trypsin inhibitor around folded,
active structure (the latter already obtained via wet-laboratory techniques) (McCammon,
511

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Gelin, & Karplus, 1977). Advancements wet-laboratory techniques, spewed
dozen models biologically-active protein structures late 70s, facilitated revolution
computational structural biology. pioneering algorithmic work Verlet, Karplus, McCammon,
Levitt, Warshel, Lifson (for Karplus, Levitt, Warshel shared 2013 Nobel Prize
chemistry) provided earliest frameworks computational treatments biomolecules
means investigate equilibrium structure dynamics (Fersht, 2013).
Since early days, advances wet-laboratory techniques proceeded hand hand
advancements computational techniques, often feeding each-other. advent NMR
structure determination provided evidence ability biomolecules fluctuate different structures even equilibrium (Kay, 1998, 2005). Figure 1(c) shows, addition X-ray
structure myoglobin bound heme group, twelve models obtained via NMR, showcasing
intrinsic flexibility important biomolecule molecular partner cell. Nowadays, wet-laboratory techniques, NMR cryo-Electron Microscopy (cryo-EM) resolve equilibrium structures quantify equilibrium dynamics. example, NMR used
identify well-populated intermediate structures along transition (Aden & Wolf-Watz, 2007).
Hybrid techniques combine NMR relaxation measurements X-ray models derived
room-temperature crystallographic, single-molecule spectroscopy techniques tune optical radiation observe one molecule, others elucidate fast slow dynamic processes lasting
picoseconds milliseconds (Torella, Holden, Santoso, Hohlbein, & Kapanidis,
2011; Fenwick, van den Bedem, Fraser, & Wright, 2014; Karam, Powdrill, Liu, Vasquez, Mah,
Bernatchez, Gotte, & Cosa, 2014; Moerner & Fromm, 2003; Greenleaf, Woodside, & Block, 2007;
Michalet, Weiss, & Jager, 2006; Diekmann & Hoischen, 2014; Hohlbein, Craggs, & Cordes, 2014;
Schlau-Cohen, Wang, Southall, Cogdell, & Moerner, 2013; Moffat, 2003; Schotte, Lim, Jackson,
Smirnov, Soman, Olson, Phillips, Wulff, & Anfinrud, 2003; Roy, Hohng, & Ha, 2008; Fenwick
et al., 2014; Hohlbein et al., 2014; Lee, M., Kim, & Suh, 2013; Socher & Imperiali, 2013; Gall,
Ilioaia, Kruger, Novoderezhkin, Robert, & van Grondelle, 2015).
particular, wet-laboratory techniques employ fluorescence-based sensors, provide
information dynamic, biological events effectively monitoring changes signals
strategically-placed fluorophores (Socher & Imperiali, 2013). Depending placement
fluorophores, binding two molecular partners switch/transition one molecule different structures monitored real time. techniques promising
rapidly adopted study specific biological systems interest, reliance fluorophores limits generality techniques, well structural detail obtained. moment, wet-laboratory techniques obtain incomplete view equilibrium dynamics, generally unable span disparate length time scales involved
structural transition molecule (Maximova, Moffatt, Ma, Nussinov, & Shehu, 2016);
atomic motions occur picosecond scale, side-chain motions take nanoseconds,
concerted motions among groups atoms facilitating structural rearrangements molecular recognition events take anywhere microseconds milliseconds (Shaw,
Maragakis, Lindorff-Larsen, Piana, Dror, Eastwood, Bank, Jumper, Salmon, Shan, & Wriggers,
2010; Lindorff-Larsen, Piana, Dror, & Shaw, 2011; Zagrovic, Snow, Shirts, & Pande, 2002; Piana, Lindorff-Larsen, & Shaw, 2012b); extreme cases, binding natural drug molecules
proteins occurs hours scale (Hoelder, Clarke, & Workman, 2012).
Computational treatments biomolecules driven promise complementing wetlaboratory treatments obtaining comprehensive detailed characterization equilibrium
512

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

dynamics. current well-known frameworks employed silico Molecular Dynamics
(MD) (Verlet, 1967; McCammon et al., 1977) Monte Carlo (MC) (Hastings, 1970; Metropolis,
Rosenbluth, Rosenbluth, Teller, & Teller, 1953). principle, entire equilibrium dynamics
molecule simulated simply following motions constitutive atoms along
physical forces atoms impose one another. foundation MD framework.
contrast, MC framework, structural perturbation moves applied atoms bonds connecting
atoms result physical forces instead design decisions. Different local search
strategies formulated make use moves iteratively explore neighborhoods
structure space biomolecule.
scope capabilities MD- MC-based treatments biomolecules significantly increased due improvements hardware parallel computation strategies. Specialized architectures, Anton, supercomputer designed MD simulations, (Piana, LindorffLarsen, Dirks, Salmon, Dror, & Shaw, 2012a; Piana et al., 2012b; Lindorff-Larsen et al., 2011),
GPUs (Stone, Phillips, Freddolino, Hardy, Trabuco, & Schulten, 2007; Harvey, Giupponi, & de
Fabritiis, 2009; Tanner, Phillips, & Schulten, 2012; Gotz, Williamson, Xu, Poole, Le Grand, &
Walker, 2012), petascale national supercomputers, BlueWaters, Titan, Mira, Stampede (Dubrow, 2015; Zhao, Perilla, Yufenyuy, Meng, Chen, Ning, Ahn, Gronenborn, Schulten,
Aiken, & Zhang, 2013) allowed characterizing biomolecular structure dynamics
microsecond time scale. Algorithmic improvements dynamic load balancing (Fattebert, Richards,
& Glosli, 2012), neighbor searches (Proctor, Lipscomb, Zou, Anderson, & Cho, 2012), optimal force splitting (Batcho, Case, & Schlick, 2001) allow effectively distributing simulation
dynamics molecular systems comprised billions particles (Perilla, Goh, Cassidy, Liu,
Bernardi, Rudack, Yu, Wu, & Schulten, 2015).
principle, full account equilibrium dynamics biomolecule requires comprehensive characterization structure space available biomolecule equilibrium well
underlying energy surface governs accessibility structures transitions
structures equilibrium. remains challenging via MD MC-based frameworks,
algorithmic enhancements classic MD MC frameworks essentially aim enhance
sampling structure space biomolecule. review state-of-the-art enhancements
found work Maximova et al. (2016).
survey paper, focus instead emerging contributions Robotics community
enhance sampling complementary algorithmic strategies. Specifically, review
robotics-inspired methods designed model structural excursions biomolecule equilibrium
building conceptually techniques designed originally robot motion planning.
methods reached crucial stage. shown applicable characterization
diverse molecular mechanisms computational structural biology, protein-ligand binding,
folding unfolding peptides, proteins, RNA molecules, transitions small peptides
large proteins thermodynamically-stable semi-stable structural states. survey shows, methods capable addressing challenging computational issues posed
application settings, yet widely adopted computational biology
community large. various reasons, discussed survey, methods
seen providing efficient less detailed less accurate characterization biomolecular equilibrium structure dynamics. survey provides critical review robotics-inspired
methods lays outstanding issues need addressed methods considered reliable tools widely adopted modeling biomolecular structure dynamics.
513

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

survey organized follows. background models biomolecular energetics
geometry provided Section 2. Section 3 introduces main classes problems
biomolecular modeling addressed robotics-inspired methods, summarizes robot motion
planning frameworks methods build, concludes brief description
challenges faced robotics-inspired methods context biomolecular modeling. Section 4
provides examples design decisions address challenges comprehensive
detailed review robotics-inspired methods modeling biomolecular structure dynamics.
Section 5 concludes survey critical summary remaining challenges discussion
several prospects future research.

2. Background
structural excursions regulate recognition events biomolecule participates
cell understood via theoretical treatment biomolecules thermodynamic systems
hopping energetic states. hops fundamentally result concerted motions
atoms make biomolecule; physical system, constitutive particles
state perpetual motion, fuelled thermal excitation, subjecting one another
physical forces (Cooper, 1984). forces cumulatively drive molecular system toward lowerenergy states, thermal excitations kick locally-optimal states, providing sufficient
randomness allow entire system undergo biased exploration structure space.
following first summarize current knowledge atomic forces biomolecular energy functions employed computational treatments biomolecular structure dynamics. rest Section provides details biomolecular geometry, showing biomolecules
treated mechanistically modular systems composed numerous, heterogeneous components purpose characterizing equilibrium structure dynamics silico.
2.1 Biomolecular Energetics: Molecular Mechanics
physical interactions among particles make molecular system principle
measured via quantum mechanics (QM) methods. QM methods carry detailed accurate
electronic structure calculations currently limited applicability molecular systems
composed hundred atoms (Khaliullin, VandeVondele, & Hutter, 2013). Instead, molecular mechanics (MM) methods methods choice evaluate structures
macromolecules, proteins, RNA, DNA, large molecular systems comprised
several molecules.
Though long known atoms molecule subject one another physical forces,
Coulomb forces others, work Levitt Warshel Lifson laboratory
Weizmann Institute Science propelled design consistent (now known MM) energy
functions molecules. Lifson argued possible come small number
consistent, transferable parameters depend local environment atom allow
analyzing energetics small crystalline molecules (Lifson & Warshel, 1968). Kendrew realized
consistent energy functions could used conduct energetic evaluations different
placements (that is, structures) atoms comprising proteins nucleic acids. Levitt
Lifson operationalized realization conduct energy refinements protein structures (Levitt &
Lifson, 1969).
514

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

MM energy functions become detailed accurate, still estimates
true potential energy molecule, summing possible, physical interactions
atoms molecule. Research designing MM energy functions active, many
different functions offered different computational chemistry labs across world.
functions largely follow common functional form, categorize pairwise atomic interactions
local non-local interactions; noted accurate energy functions
available consider n-particle interactions, computationally expensive
widely adopted (Clementi, 2008). Local interactions concern modeling forces due bonds,
bond angles, periodicity dihedral/torsion angles. Non-local interactions divided
electrostatic (measured Coulomb potential) van der Waals (measured
Lennard-Jones LJ potential) interactions. different types interactions typically
linearly combined together, weight, associate potential energy value
particular placement atoms given molecular structure.
following equation provides example popular CHARMM energy function (Brooks,
Bruccoleri, Olafson, States, Swaminathan, & Karplus, 1983) integrated NAMD software package simulation biomolecular dynamics (Phillips, Braun, Wang, Gumbart, Tajkhorshid, Villa, Chipot, Skeel, Kale, & Schulten, 2005).

ECHARMM =

X

kb (b b0 )2

+

kUB (S S0 )2

+

X

+

bonds

X
UB

k ( 0 )2

valence angles

X

k (1 + cos(n ))

+

kimp ( 0 )2

+

dihedral angles

X
improper dihedral angles

X
nonbonded atoms i, j

X
nonbonded atomsi, j

ij

h Rmin
Rminij 6
ij 12
2
+
rij
rij

qi qj
rij

k weights constants, 0 subscript indicates equilibrium, ideal values distances
angles. first term effectively penalizes deviations bond lengths equilibrium values
quadratic potential. second term, referred Urey Bradley (UB)
1,3 term, introduces similar penalty pairs atoms separated two covalent bonds,
distance two atoms involved 1,3 interaction denoted S. third term quadratic
potential valence angles (between two consecutive bonds), denoted . fourth term
potential calculated dihedral/torsion angles models presence steric barriers
atoms separated three covalent bonds. term, n variables multiplicity
phase angles, respectively. CHARMM, improper dihedral angles specially penalized,
fifth term. sixth term shows LJ potential CHARMM. LJ term summing
515

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

van der Waals interactions non-bonded atoms, rij measures Euclidean distance
two non-bonded atoms (that covered UB term), Rminij = (Rmini + Rminj )/2
minimum interaction radius atoms, measured half sum known van
der Waals radii Rmini Rminj (ij weight specific types atoms j). LJ
term sums weak attraction long distances strong repulsion short distances. LJ
term CHARMM 126 functional form, exponent 12 repulsive sub-term
exponent 6 attractive sub-term. last term CHARMM function measures
electrostatic interactions via Coulomb potential: qi qj known partial charges atoms
j, rij measures Euclidean distance atoms j, dielectric constant
encoding type environment biomolecule (vacuum different types solvent
environments).
Differences available potential energy functions due different weights, different
exponents used measure repulsion versus attraction terms van der Waals interaction,
explicit estimation hydrogen-bonding interactions outside umbrella van der Waals interactions, (Hornak, Abel, Okur, Strockbine, Roitberg, & Simmerling, 2006). Amber suite
energy functions, integrated Amber MD simulation package (Case, Darden, Cheatham,
Simmerling, Wang, Duke, Luo, Merz, Pearlman, Crowley, Walker, Zhang, Wang, Hayik, Roitberg,
Seabra, Wong, Paesani, Wu, Brozell, Tsui, Gohlke, Yang, Tan, Mongan, et al., 2014), OPLS (Jorgensen, Maxwell, & Tirado-Reves, 1988), CHARMM follow similar functional form.
similar functions CEDAR (Hermans, Berendsen, van Gunsteren, & Postma, 1984) GROMOS (van Gunsteren, Billeter, Eising, Hunenberger, Kruger, Mark, Scott, & Tironi, 1996), incorporated GROMACS simulation package (Van Der Spoel, Lindahl, Hess, Groenhof, Mark,
& Berendsen, 2005), others. review functions, known physics-based function,
found work Ponder Case (2003). functions, known knowledge-based
function, include additional terms derived conducting statistics known active structures
proteins PDB. functions best suited specific applications, rapid modeling
equilibrium structures. Rosetta (Leaver-Fay, Tyka, Lewis, Lange, Thompson, Jacak, Kaufman,
Renfrew, Smith, Sheffler, Davis, Cooper, Treuille, Mandell, Richter, Ban, Fleishman, Corn, Kim,
Lyskov, Berrondo, Mentzer, Popovi, & et. al., 2011) Quark (Xu & Zhang, 2012) recent
examples knowledge-based functions.
Whether physics-based knowledge-based (or hybrid), current molecular energy functions
models and, such, contain inherent errors need taken account modeling biomolecular structure dynamics (Hornak et al., 2006). addition, functions, despite specific functional form, computationally expensive terms LJ
Coulomb terms due summation pairs atoms. terms ones
sensitive small atomic motions. particular, 12-6 functional form LJ term
provides great complexity non-linearity energy surface one associate
structure space biomolecule. quite common reduce total energy structure
hundred calories solely due improvements LJ term imperceptible changes
atomic positions. Moreover, small atomic displacements lower value one term
increasing another energy function. optimization point view, terms
linearly combined energy function essentially conflicting optimization objectives.
computational biology, issue known frustration results rugged rough energy
surfaces (that is, rich local minima). broader AI community, surfaces would referred multi-modal. true biomolecular energy surfaces overly rugged (known
516

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

principle minimal frustration) (Clementi, 2008; Nevo, Brumfeld, Kapon, Hinterdorfer, &
Reich, 2005), modeled energy surfaces one probe silico current energy functions shown exceptionally rugged (Olson & Shehu, 2012; Molloy, Saleh, & Shehu, 2013;
Lois, Blawzdziewicz, & OHern, 2010).
2.2 Biomolecular Energy Surface
Equilibrium biomolecular dynamics visualized structural excursions energy surface. picture emerges proteins funnel-like, multidimensional energy surface (Onuchic et al., 1997; Dill & Chan, 1997). Projecting surface onto coordinates
capture relevant features different structures would allow summarizing thus visualizing
energy surface terms landscape (Onuchic & Wolynes, 2004).
energy landscape shown two different camera views Figure 2 illustrates protein energy
landscapes expected reconstructed silico. Horizontal cross-sections landscape every
dE units apart correspond different energetic states. cross-sections go width
energy decreases; fewer options place atoms molecule potential energy gets lower
without incurring energetic costs greater dE. width cross-section, structural
diversity energetic state, captured notion entropy. Thermodynamically-stable states
low free energy F , measured F = hEi S, hEi average potential
energy structures grouped together state, temperature, entropy.
first visual illustration, proposed Dill Chan (1997), highlighted main features
expected true protein energy landscapes, single, deep wide basin corresponding
thermodynamically-stable state shallower, narrower basins corresponding metastable states serving possible kinetic traps. landscape shown Figure 2(a) synthetic
one closer landscapes corresponding existing MM energy functions; landscape
smooth rather rich local minima; words, landscape highly rugged
rough. different camera view Figure 2(b) emphasizes presence multiple, similarly-deep
wide basins among current energy functions cannot distinguish purpose
predicting stable state via energetic-based arguments; given inherent errors, structurefunction arguments cannot depend small energetic differences.
energy landscape view instrumental linking molecular structure, dynamics, function. Viewing proteins biomolecules terms energy landscapes gave rise better
understanding folding binding diffusion-like processes series sequential, deterministic events. new, landscape view (Baldwin, 1995), biomolecules reach
stable state equilibrium tumbling energy landscape along multiple routes (Bryngelson & Wolynes, 1987; Bryngelson, Onuchic, Socci, & Wolynes, 1995; Onuchic & Wolynes, 2004).
light new view, intermediate, meta-stable states proteins would sometimes
found wet laboratory transitioning stable state correspond wide
basins landscape. illustration provided Figure 2(b).
new view inspired new understanding dynamic molecular processes, known conformational selection population shift (Ma, Kumar, Tsai, & Nussinov, 1999; Tsai, Ma, & Nussinov,
1999b; Tsai, Kumar, Ma, & Nussinov, 1999a). Conformational selection refers idea
states unbound molecular unit present accessible bound unit. many unbound/uncomplexed biomolecules, may many semi-stable states equilibrium. proximity ligand another molecular partner shifts equilibrium (and thus probability distri517

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

(a) Illustration complex energy landscape

(b) Tilted camera view highlights presence multiple energy basins
Figure 2: (a) shown landscape illustrates often reconstructed silico, rough landscapes rich
local minima. (b) tilted camera view emphasizes presence multiple energetic basins. basin
defined neighborhood local minimum fitness landscape. interested reader encouraged learn features landscapes arise optimization problems Stadlers seminal
review (Stadler, 2002). Given high dimensionality structure space, many methods probe energy
landscapes cannot guarantee particular, sought stable meta-stable state captured among
probed basins, none probed basins artifacts energy function employed.

bution possible states system found equilibrium) towards one states
close optimal equilibrium unbound/uncomplexed molecule. words, presence binding partner considered external perturbation unbound/uncomplexed
energy landscape. Internal perturbations refer changes biomolecules composition due
changes DNA, copy read errors, post-translation modifications occur.
many aberrant versions biomolecule, energy barriers stable semi-stable states
518

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

drastically change modify underlying detailed structural mechanism regulating function,
resulting dysfunction even loss function (Clausen, Ma, Nussinov, & Shehu, 2015).
principle conformational selection allows employing analysis energy landscapes
unbound molecules identify structural states interest complexation events. latter
found among meta-stable stable states uncomplexed molecule thus
identified via modeling simulation uncomplexed molecule.
2.3 Computing Structures Structural Transitions
two main problems addressed silico elucidate biomolecular equilibrium structure dynamics concern (i) computing ensemble structures constituting stable
meta-stable states relevant biological function (ii) computing detailed structural transitions structures. first problem amenable stochastic optimization, fundamentally involves locating deep wide basins/minima nonlinear multimodal energy
surface. second problem entails elucidating different routes employed biomolecule
switches two structures. survey focuses primarily second problem, computing structural transitions bound unbound biomolecules. Specifically, survey reviews
methods employ robotics analogies address problem. While, principle, roboticsinspired methods provide information structure space available biomolecule
equilibrium, other, powerful stochastic optimization algorithms exist purpose.
refer interested readers review Shehu (2013), surveys state-of-the-art evolutionary
algorithms (EAs) capable extracting efficient, discrete representations protein energy surfaces.
minimum, algorithms aiming model biomolecular structures comprised three
functional units: (i) way represent/model biomolecular structure; (ii) way modify
models order obtain new structures; (iii) way evaluate energetics structures.
existing MM energy functions summarized context biomolecular energetics
provide way evaluate models biomolecular structures explored silico. functional units
(i) (iii) related, model chosen protein structure determines great extent
moves perturbation operators designed efficiently effectively explore
structure space. Below, summarize models popular among different algorithms
employed model equilibrium structures dynamics biomolecules. Details regarding
moves perturbation operators designed interface models provided later
survey reviewing robotics-inspired methods.
2.4 Molecular Models: Selecting Variables Interest
Covalent bonds link atoms together molecule. protein molecules, atoms organized
amino acids, come twenty different types nature. amino acids contain common
core heavy atoms make backbone unique set heavy atoms make
side chain (hydrogen/light atoms found backbone side-chain groups). twenty
naturally-occurring amino acids differ side chain. Figure 3(a) shows N, CA, C,
heavy-atoms comprise backbone amino acid illustrates amino acids
connected via covalent, peptide bonds serial fashion form (polypeptide) chain.
referred protein often one polypeptide chain; protein-protein binding polypeptide
chains stay together via non-covalent, weak interactions.
519

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

(a)

(b)

Figure 3: (a) chain six amino acids, backbone atoms N (gray), CA (black), C (gray),
(silver). peptide bond Ni -Ci+1 links two amino acids (i proceeds N- C-terminus, refer
backbone N C atoms peptide bonds). Circled atoms comprise side chain shown amino
acid. (b) three types internal coordinates shown here, bond length di , valence angle
two consecutive angles, torsion dihedral angle defined three consecutive bonds.
dihedral angle angle two normals corresponding planes defined
consecutive bonds j j + 1 consecutive bonds j + 1 j + 2. Depending backbone
bonds defined, dihedral angles referred either , annotated position
amino acid defined (in direction N- C-terminus). instance,
refers dihedral angle bond connecting backbone N backbone CA atom amino acid
i, refers dihedral angle defined bond connecting backbone CA backbone C
atom amino acid i. Characteristic values observed , psi angles among equilibrium protein
structures (Ramachandran et al., 1963).

520

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Figure 3(a) illustrates side chains dangle backbone polypeptide chain. Treating
protein molecule model atoms represented balls bonds
sticks exposes interesting questions regarding perform deformations model without
breaking covalent bonds. question essence structure modeling researchers
answer defining variables represent molecule able capture intrinsic
flexibility equilibrium.
2.4.1 C ARTESIAN C OORDINATE -BASED ODELS
intuitive model molecular structure, Cartesian coordinate atom
selected variable. Cartesian coordinate-based model preferred one MD algorithms, move individual atoms molecule according cumulative force sums
interactions atom others molecule. However, model ideal. First,
redundant, demanding 3N variables molecule N atoms. small peptide drug
molecules, number atoms may dozens, even small proteins, number
atoms easily surpass hundred; result, variable space hundreds dimensions.
Many strategies offered reduce number variables essentially removing
certain atoms modeling. example, side-chain atoms first sacrificed protein
structure modeling, since demonstrated main features equilibrium protein
structures captured backbone (Rose, Fleming, Banavar, & Maritan, 2006).
reduced structures modeled, side chains modeled via side-chain packing algorithms.
studies focusing modeling molecular interactions, atoms comprise interaction
site explicitly modeled. decisions effectively result reduced models (and thus fewer dimensions selected variable space), ranging CA traces, central CA atom
modeled amino acid, backbone models, backbone chain tracked
3d space (Papoian, Ulander, Eastwood, Luthey-Schulten, & Wolynes, 2004; Matysiak & Clementi,
2004; Das, Matysiak, & Clementi, 2005; Matysiak & Clementi, 2006; Hoang, Trovato, Seno, Banavar, & Maritan, 2007; Rose et al., 2006). rich literature reduced models
energy functions designed interface models (Clementi, 2008).
Representing molecular structure terms Cartesian coordinates (or subset of)
constitutive atoms appealing, new instantiation variable space readily
evaluated terms energetics. recall central LJ electrostatic/Coulomb terms
energy functions widely adopted biomolecular structure dynamics modeling operate 3d coordinates atoms. However, Cartesian coordinate-based model
redundant ineffective. First, model results excessive number variables, poses
great challenges sampling-based method aimed probing structure space one sample
time. Second, ineffective, encode explicit implicit geometric
constraints present molecular structures.
Many efforts computational biophysics community target reduction coordinates.
resulting models referred coarse-grained models representations. first
model, employed MC simulation folding bovine pancreatic trypsin inhibitor,
represented amino-acid residue one pseudo-atom (Levitt & Warshel, 1975). Work
coarse-grained multiscale models (in latter, different parts structure represented
different levels detail/resolution different time length scales) key extend
spatio-temporal reach MD MC simulations biomolecular dynamics. work
521

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

additional onerous task designing accompanying energy functions reproduce known
thermodynamic properties even lower mixed structural resolution. Indeed, 2013 Nobel
Prize Warshel recognized seminal work multiscale models built QM/MM
method (Warshel & Levitt, 1976; Warshel, 2003; Kamerlin, Haranczyk, & Warshel, 2009; Mukherjee & Warshel, 2011, 2012; Dryga, Chakrabarty, Vicatos, & Warshel, 2011; Rychkova, Mukherjee,
Bora, & Warshel, 2013; Mukherjee & Warshel, 2013). interested reader directed review
Clementi (2008) coarse-grained models. review Zhou (2014) focuses multiscale
models.
2.4.2 E NCODING VARIABLE EPENDENCIES C ARTESIAN C OORDINATE -BASED ODELS
Outside realm modeling chemical reaction processes, bond formation breaking,
modeling biomolecular equilibrium structures dynamics, application setups require
preserving certain structural features formulated local non-local constraints.
constraints, keeping bonded atoms distance ideal/equilibrium length
bond, known explicit, local constraints. trivially extracted specification
chemical composition molecule, involve neighboring atoms. Equilibrium conditions
place additional, implicit constraints biomolecular structures. need preserve favorable
Lennard-Jones interactions, instance, places (non-local/long-range) constraints non-bonded
atoms. long-range constraints cannot effectively captured model
variable Cartesian coordinate atom. perturbation operator interfaces
model modifies variables information invalid energetically-unfavorable
assignments subsets variables, variable dependencies captured model.
external energy model crucial form energy function evaluate results
perturbation operator detect variable instantiations resulting violations.
Cartesian coordinate-based model encode variable dependencies. latter
extracted via several techniques, including multivariate analysis techniques analyze known
equilibrium structures biomolecule identify subsets atoms exhibit simultaneous displacements; is, move concert. essential premise techniques known
structures good examples solutions near-solutions energy function, analysis
examples expose variable dependencies. dependencies employed
design reduced Cartesian coordinate-based models readily encode energetic
constraints satisfied provided examples (solution near-solution structures) effective
perturbation operators readily yield new near-solution instantiations reduced variable
space (Clausen & Shehu, 2015).
Multivariate Analysis Techniques Obtain Collective Variables sub-field statistical
techniques identification collective motions, referred collective coordinates collective variables rich, review subject survey. Instead, point
recent work narrow context biomolecular modeling, variance-maximizing techniques, Principal Component Analysis (PCA) (Shlens, 2003), Isomap (Tenenbaum, de Silva,
& Langford, 2000), Locally Linear Embedding (Roweis & Saul, 2000), Diffusion Maps (Coifman,
Lafon, Lee, Maggioni, Nadler, Warner, & Zucker, 2005), others (van der Maaten, Postma, & van
den Herik, 2009) employed analyze biomolecular structures dynamics (Teodoro,
Phillips, & Kavraki, 2003; Das, Moll, Stamati, Kavraki, & Clementi, 2006; Plaku, Stamati, Clementi,
& Kavraki, 2007; Gorfe et al., 2008; Grant et al., 2009; Hori, Chikenji, & Takada, 2009; Maisuradze,
522

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Liwo, & Scheraga, 2009; Rohrdanz, Zheng, Maggioni, & Clementi, 2011; Zheng, Rohrdanz, Maggioni, & Clementi, 2011) and, importantly, identify variables represent collective motions
atoms (Zheng, Rohrdanz, & Clementi, 2013; Clausen & Shehu, 2015; Clausen et al., 2015; Molloy, Clausen, & Shehu, 2016; Maximova, Plaku, & Shehu, 2015). addition methods,
ones Normal Mode Analysis (NMA) (Ciu & Bahar, 2005) rich history
computational structural biology (Atilgan, Durell, Jernigan, Demirel, Keskin, & Bahar, 2001;
Delarue & Sanejouand, 2002; Kim, Chirikjian, & Jernigan, 2002b; Zheng & Doniach, 2003; Tama,
Valle, Frank, & Brooks, 2003; Bahar & Rader, 2005; Maragakis & Karplus, 2005; Zheng & Brooks,
2005; Zheng, Brooks, & Hummer, 2007; Yang, Song, Carriquiry, & Jernigan, 2008; Yang, Majek,
& Bahar, 2009; Das, Gur, Cheng, Jo, Bahar, & Roux, 2014). normal modes extracted
NMA often employed effective perturbation operators robotics-inspired methods (Tama & Sanejouand, 2001; Kim, Jernigan, & Chirikjian, 2002a; Kirillova, Cortes, Stefaniu, &
Simeon, 2008; Schuyler, Jernigan, Wasba, Ramakrishnan, & Chirikjian, 2009; Teknipar & Zheng,
2010; Baron, 2013; Al-Bluwi, Vaisset, Simeon, & Cortes, 2013). summary highlights
robotics-inspired methods later survey describe greater detail collective variables
employment effective perturbation operators.
2.5 Internal Coordinate- Angular-Based Models
internal coordinate model offered effective alternative Cartesian coordinatebased model (Burgess & Scheraga, 1975). internal-coordinate model, variables
selected bond lengths, angles two consecutive bonds, torsion dihedral angles
three consecutive bonds. Figure 3(b) provides illustration. model allows fast
forward kinematics, changes Cartesian coordinates result changes values
variables efficiently calculated via accumulation rigid-body transformations (Craig, 1989;
Zhang & Kavraki, 2002a).
Internal coordinate-based models norm non-MD based molecular structure modeling. additional simplification made equilibrium protein structures. Analysis deposited
equilibrium structures proteins reveals bond lengths bond angles constrained characteristic values (Engh & Huber, 1991). consequence energetic constraints placed
structures equilibrium exploited idealize protein geometry modeling effectively
removing bond lengths bond angles list variables model. leaves
dihedral angles defined three consecutive bonds variables (, backbone angles
four dihedral side-chain angles per amino acid, shown Figure 3(a)) computationally appealing, number dihedral angles polypeptide chain N atoms average
3N/7 (Abayagan, Totrov, & Kuznetsov, 1994). worth noting bond lengths bond angles change even equilibrium, faster pace motions. Employing idealized
geometry allows devoting computation obtaining slower fluctuations first. structures
representative molecules equilibrium dynamics obtained, deviations bond lengths
bond angles introduced studied via detailed models.
2.5.1 B IOMOLECULES K INEMATIC C HAINS R EVOLUTE J OINTS
Idealizing protein geometry reveals mechanistic analogies kinematic chains revolute
joints. Similarly joint rotation changes positions following links, rotation
dihedral angle change positions following atoms (Craig, 1989). analogies
523

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

employed robotics researchers apply algorithms plan motions kinematic chains
revolute joints study protein conformations (Manocha & Zhu, 1994; Singh, Latombe, &
Brutlag, 1999; Apaydin, Singh, Brutlag, & Latombe, 2001; Amato, Dill, & Song, 2003; Apaydin,
Brutlag, Guestrin, Hsu, & Latombe, 2003; Song & Amato, 2004; Cortes, Simeon, & Tran, 2004;
Cortes, Simeon, Guieysse, Remaud-Simeon, & Tran, 2005; Lee, Streinu, & Brock, 2005; Kim
et al., 2002a; Chiang, Apaydin, Brutlag, Hsu, & Latombe, 2007; Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy
et al., 2013; Molloy & Shehu, 2013; Haspel, Moll, Baker, Chiu, & E., 2010; Shehu, Clementi, &
Kavraki, 2006). Unlike typical articulated robotic mechanisms, protein chains pose hundreds rather
dozen variables (a short backbone 50 amino acids poses 100 dihedral angles variables).
analogies protein chains kinematic chains revolute joints popular
among robotics researchers proposing robotics-inspired methods modeling biomolecular structure dynamics. instance, torsional angles employed early model protein ligand
binding (Singh et al., 1999) remain popular modeling kinetics folding small protein
RNA molecules (Han & Amato, 2001; Amato et al., 2003; Song & Amato, 2004; Thomas,
Song, & Amato, 2005; Thomas, Tang, Tapia, & Amato, 2007; Tang, Thomas, Tapia, Giedroc, &
Amato, 2008; Tapia, Thomas, & Amato, 2010). angles proved popular computing
functionally-relevant structures peptides proteins (Haspel, Tsai, Wolfson, & Nussinov, 2003;
Shehu et al., 2006; Shehu, Clementi, & Kavraki, 2007; Shehu, Kavraki, & Clementi, 2007, 2008;
Cortes et al., 2004; Shehu, Kavraki, & Clementi, 2009; Shehu, 2009; Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy
et al., 2013), well modeling peptides proteins switching different functionallyrelevant structures (Cortes et al., 2005; Jaillet, Cortes, & Simeon, 2008; Haspel et al., 2010; Jaillet,
Corcho, Perez, & Cortes, 2011; Molloy et al., 2016; Molloy & Shehu, 2013, 2015; Devaurs, Molloy,
Vaisset, Shehu, Cortes, & Simeon, 2015; Molloy & Shehu, 2016).
Techniques Obtain Reduced Angular-based Models number variables angularbased models reduced via various techniques. instance, consecutive dihedral
angles bundled together fragments capture variable dependencies. technique,
known molecular fragment replacement introduced context MC-based methods
de novo protein structure prediction (Bradley, Misura, & Baker, 2005), allows operationalizing
observation limited number configurations observed k-bundles consecutive
dihedral angles among stable protein structures equilibrium (Han & Baker, 1996). technique incorporated robotics-inspired methods modeling equilibrium protein structure dynamics (Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy et al., 2013; Molloy & Shehu, 2013, 2016).
application-specific techniques analyze structures reduce prioritize number dihedral angles manipulation perturbation operator. Rigidity-based techniques, instance, analyze
given structure detect least-constrained regions suggest order dihedral angles
modify first often order focus computational resources computing large structural deformations first (Thorpe & Ming, 2004; Wells, Menor, Hespenheide, & Thorpe, 2005; Fox
& Streinu, 2013). Rigidity-based analysis incorporated robotics-inspired methods
modeling protein dynamics (Thomas et al., 2007). techniques aimed specifically modeling structural transitions large proteins (Raveh, Enosh, Furman-Schueler, & Halperin, 2009;
Haspel et al., 2010). these, comparison two structures transition sought
identifies differently-valued dihedral angles. similar fashion rigidity-based analysis,
angles prioritized modified often perturbation operators order capture
possibly large structural deformations reasonable amount time. techniques make
524

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

several assumptions variables participate process interest, highlight
assumptions implications later survey.
Biomolecular Structure versus Biomolecular Conformation light various models
employed represent biomolecular structure, distinction needs made
terms structure conformation. term structure meant refer specification
Cartesian coordinates atoms comprise molecule (even atoms explicitly
modeled, backbone reduced structure). term conformation meant general refer specification values variables selected model structure;
is, conformation particular instantiation employed variable space. instance, conformation instantiation angles angular-based model employed, forward kinematics
allows obtaining structure encoded conformation. worth noting terms
conformation structure often used interchangeably slight abuse terminology
biomolecular modeling literature. instance, many algorithms explicitly modify structures via Cartesian coordinate-based models referred conformational search algorithms;
course, models employed, structure extracted trivially conformation. survey, distinction made observed referring structures
conformations.
specific domain robotics-inspired methods, term (molecular) conformation equivalent (robot) configuration. However, keeping broader computational biology literature, employ term conformation referring macromolecules, proteins,
RNA, DNA, reserving term configuration small molecules (also referred ligands)
bind macromolecules. addition, term variable often referred parameter broader computational biology biophysics literature degree freedom (dof)
robotics AI literature, employ general, non-domain specific term variable
variable space. is, (molecular) conformation instantiation space selected
variables. Depending number variables selected model molecule investigation, variable space may high-dimensional. Mapping conformation corresponding
structure allows associating structure space employed variable space. Moreover, energy
functions allow associating energy surface structure space, interesting observations
regarding stable semi-stable structural states excursions among states made
analyzing structure space low-dimensional projections/embeddings underlying energy
surface, hence energy landscape.
Educational Resources purpose material related provide enough detail
biomolecular geometry allow seeing biomolecules treated mechanistically modular systems composed numerous, heterogeneous components purpose characterizing
silico. information readers varying levels background interest
found online, educational learning modules designed introduce computer scientists computational structural biology. One set modules, publicly accessible cnx project
highly popular students researchers, found http://cnx.org/contents/
9cMfjngH@6.3:ppj-3H2A@14/Structural-Computational-Biolo. modules, instance, interested readers learn protein architecture greater detail.
modules mirror material summarized representations energy functions, yet others introduce readers forward inverse kinematics modular mechanical systems, making
modules good supplement survey robotics-inspired methods presented here.
525

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

3. Summary Biomolecular Modeling Problems Robot Motion Planning
Frameworks
introduce main classes problems biomolecular modeling addressed
robotics-inspired methods. robot motion planning frameworks methods build
summarized next. section concludes summary challenges faced algorithmic realizations frameworks modeling biomolecular structure dynamics. challenges
preview important design decisions detailed Section 4 context reviewing
representative methods.
3.1 Representative Problems Biomolecular Modeling
Two main classes molecular mechanisms studied robotics-inspired methods,
involve one molecule associating/complexating disassociating one another,
involve dynamic, uncomplexated molecule. application setups, concern
informing understanding dynamic events involving dynamic molecules.
first application setup, robotics-inspired methods aim model understand proteinligand binding events. Provided unbound structures protein receptor small ligand
molecule, objective elucidate ligand approaches binds protein receptor. related problem, reverse process addressed. ligand bound receptor,
goal determine motions ligand protein receptor allow disassociation.
Modeling protein-ligand binding important general understanding biology
computation-aided drug discovery. molecular recognition events
protein-protein, protein-DNA, protein-RNA, protein-membrane binding conceptually fall
category protein-ligand binding, challenging due higher number
variables needed model association complexation event currently beyond domain applicability robotics-inspired methods.
second application setup concerns modeling understanding dynamics molecules.
Almost exclusively, focus robotics-inspired techniques category uncomplexed protein RNA molecules. goal elucidate structural deformations motions allow
protein RNA molecule transition two structural states interest. states
unfolded folded state, case goal highlight folding unfolding
paths, stable semi-stable structures employed molecule recognize
lock onto different molecules, case goal formulate hypothesis regarding
impact structure molecular recognitions healthy diseased cell.
Figures 4-5 illustrates problems. Figure 4, robotics-inspired method highlight
ligand approaches protein receptor, well binds onto receptor
configuration. variables interest need minimum include translational rotational
variables ligand, well internal coordinates capture potential structural flexibility
ligand. receptor considered frozen 3d space. accurate setup would
consider internal coordinates receptor order model possible structural flexibility
upon ligand binding. However, resulting number variables would large. roboticsinspired method elucidate bound ligand configuration bound placement
relative receptor, possible routes successive configurations placements
ligand may follow approach binding site(s). addition, Figure 5(a) illustrates,
robotics-inspired method show possible routes successive structures employed
526

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Figure 4: (a) ligand bind protein receptor? Many methods designed
elucidate step-by-step process ligand approaches protein molecule, binds,
configuration.

protein fold, thus shedding light process protein folding unfolding. Similar setups
consider RNA molecules. Figure 5(b) illustrates often robotics-inspired methods employed
reveal folding unfolding routes protein, structural transitions
two structures interest; knowledge probable routes carry transition allows
understanding structural level mechanism biomolecule regulates biological
activity cell.
3.2 Foundations Robotics-inspired Treatments Biomolecules
fundamental assumption robotics-inspired treatments biomolecules mechanistic
analogies molecular chains robot chains allow putting together efficient algorithms
rapid exploration molecular structure spaces modeling excursions molecules
spaces (Manocha & Zhu, 1994; Singh et al., 1999; Apaydin et al., 2001; Amato et al., 2003; Apaydin
et al., 2003; Song & Amato, 2004; Cortes et al., 2005; Kim et al., 2002a; Chiang et al., 2007;
Kirillova et al., 2008). is, instead simulating molecule navigates energy surface
via gradient-based local search techniques, powerful techniques put together
building algorithms demonstrated high exploration capability robot configuration
spaces. Robotics-inspired treatments biomolecules draw techniques fast forward
527

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

(a) Protein folding

(b) Structural Transitions
Figure 5: (a) proteins fold? Shedding light process protein folding important goal,
many robotics-inspired methods devoted elucidating process step step computing
probable succession structures assumed protein navigating unfolded folded state.
(b) proteins transition diverse structures use interacting different partners
cell? Robotics-inspired methods seek elucidate structural transitions meta-stable stable
structural states protein.

inverse kinematics and, importantly, sampling-based algorithms developed algorithmic
robotics community address robot motion-planning problem (Choset & et al., 2005).
528

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

objective robot motion planning obtain paths take robot given, start
configuration given, goal configuration. robot motion planning problem bears mechanistic
analogies problem computing conformations along transition trajectory biomolecule;
problems, driving objective uncover underlying (molecular) conformation (robot) configuration space employed motions articulated system start
goal conformation configuration. Analogies molecular bonds robot links molecular atoms robot joints help draw techniques perform fast kinematics kinematic
linkages (Manocha, Zhu, & Wright, 1995; Zhang & Kavraki, 2002b); is, specifying values
variables selected represent molecular conformation, rapidly update Cartesian coordinates
corresponding structure (Zhang & Kavraki, 2002b). inverse kinematics setting,
techniques allow rapidly obtaining values underlying variables consistent Cartesian-based
constraints (Chirikjian, 1993; Manocha & Canny, 1994; Zhang & Kavraki, 2002a; Kolodny, Guibas,
Levitt, & Koehl, 2005).
higher level, robotics-inspired methods operationalize two key observations. first
observation, originally made robot configuration spaces, solution-containing regions
high-dimensional non-linear variable space found heuristic rather exact
approaches; stochastic, sampling-based techniques construct distribution constraintsatisfying instantiations two-stage manner; initial distribution first constructed via sampling unconstrained variable space. Instantiations evaluated external (energetic) models capable capturing inter-variable dependencies penalizing violations constraints. Violating samples either removed down-weighted initial, uninformed distribution gradually converges containing solutions. second observation transitions
system two given solutions modeled via discrete, kinetic models essentially
embed solutions graph-like structures amenable rapid, shortest, lowest-cost path queries,
provided lengths cost metrics associated given series configurations
path. Methods embed solutions tree referred tree-based methods,
embed solutions graph referred roadmap-based methods.
3.3 Motion Planning Framework: Tree- Roadmap-Based Methods
context molecular modeling, tree-based methods grow tree conformation space
given, start given, goal conformation representing structures bridged sought transition. tree incrementally extended, every iteration adding new conformation node
new branch tree. Depending whether tree pulled towards configurations sampled
random configuration space pushed leaves towards new regions configuration space, method known Rapidly Random Exploring Tree (RRT) (LaValle & Kuffner,
2001), Expansive Spaces Tree (EST) (Hsu, Kindel, Latombe, & Rock, 2002), accordingly.
important note sampling connectivity go hand hand, every sampled conformation added growing tree. growth tree biased goal conformation
reached reasonable computational time. result, tree-based methods efficient
limited sampling. known single-query methods, answer one
start-to-goal query time; is, one path consecutive conformations connect
start goal extracted. Running multiple times sample ensemble conformation paths query results ensemble high inter-path correlations due
biasing conformation tree.
529

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Roadmap-based methods adapt Probabilistic Road Map (PRM) framework
(Kavraki, Svestka, Latombe, & Overmars, 1996). Rather grow tree conformation space,
methods detach sampling conformations connectivity model encodes
neighborhood relationships among conformations conformation space. Typically, sampling
stage first provides discrete representation conformation space interest, conformations satisfying explicit implicit geometric energetic constraints, roadmap building
stage embeds sampled conformations graph/roadmap connecting one nearest neighbors. Roadmap-based methods provide richer information regarding dynamic event,
multiple paths may exist roadmap connecting two structures interest. Moreover,
methods support multiple queries, principle graph used extract paths connecting different given structures. structures specified conformations connected
nearest neighbors graph, graph queried optimal paths. practice,
difficult obtain broad dense sampling sufficient regions conformation space
molecule elucidate diverse excursions structures interest.
provide detail tree-based roadmap-based methods robotics familiarize reader diverse design decisions employed even adapted robotics-inspired
methods biomolecular modeling.
3.3.1 N - HIERARCHICAL REE -BASED ROBOT OTION P LANNING ETHODS
Tree-based methods categorized broadly based strategies employed select vertex
expand tree. Non-hierarchical strategies consider vertices possible
candidates. Hierarchical strategies place tree vertices bottom layer introduce additional
high-level layers group similar vertices together, proceeding top bottom layer
selection process.
RRT one widely used non-hierarchical tree-based motion planning methods.
RRT (LaValle & Kuffner, 2001), iteration, tree expanded towards randomly-sampled
configuration qrand . nearest vertex, qnear , tree qrand determined according distance metric. local planner attempts connect qnear qrand . Often local planner interpolates
underlying variables generate intermediate configurations. basic version RRT,
iteration stops one interpolation step. connect version, expansion continues
qrand reached interpolation results invalid configuration, e.g., collision obstacles.
process sampling configuration expanding nearest neighbor tree repeated goal reached. Figure 6 shows tree. using random sampling nearest
neighbors, RRT exhibits Voronoi bias enables expansion tree toward unexplored
regions. bias search towards goal, qrand often selected probability b (often set
0.05) goal configuration probability 1 b uniformly random.
years, different RRT variants developed order improve exploration.
adaptive dynamic domain RRT (ADDRRT) (Jaillet, Yershova, LaValle, & Simeon, 2005) associates sampling radius tree vertex dynamically adjusts radius based
success local planner. reachability-guided RRT (RGRRT) (Shkolnik, Walter, & Tedrake,
2009) relies notion reachable sets increase likelihood successful tree expansions. obstacle-based RRT (OBRRT) (Rodriguez, Tang, Lien, & Amato, 2006b) increases
sampling near obstacles, PCARRT (Dalibard & Laumond, 2009) relies PCA, selective
retraction-based RRT (SRRRT) (Lee, Kwon, Zhang, & Yoon, 2014) uses bridge sampling se530

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Figure 6: tree built RRT shown simplistic environment.

lective retraction order facilitate expansions inside narrow passages. utility-guided RRT
(UGRRT) (Burns & Brock, 2007) associates utility measure vertex uses promote expansions increase utility. RRT-Blossom (Kalisiak & van de Panne, 2006) creates
flood-fill behavior locally explore area surrounding vertex. Machine learning
used derive distance metric captures cost-to-go order improve exploration
RRT (Palmieri & Arras, 2015). reachable volume RRT (RVRRT) (McMahon, Thomas, &
Amato, 2015) relies notion reachable volumes order restrict sampling feasible
regions improve performance RRT highly-constrained problems. abstractionguided RRT (fRRT) (Kiesel, Burns, & Ruml, 2012) uses A* search grid-based decomposition
bias RRT sampling towards low-cost regions. RRT* (Karaman & Frazzoli, 2011) rewires
branches RRT find optimal solutions respect given cost function.
EST (Hsu et al., 2002) takes different approach RRT pushing frontier
tree towards unexplored areas. Instead relying expansions nearest neighbor, EST
maintains probability distribution tree vertices. iteration, vertex v selected
probability inversely proportional density small neighborhood around v. allows
EST push tree towards less-explored regions configuration space.
3.3.2 H IERARCHICAL REE -BASED OTION P LANNING ETHODS
Hierarchical tree-based methods rely scheme first selects region vertex
expand tree. Regions often defined based decomposition low-dimensional
projection configuration space. rationale that, grouping similar vertices, better
selections made region level effectively guide tree exploration. instance,
single-query, bidirectional, lazy collision-checking (SBL) method (Sanchez & Latombe, 2002)
pushes tree toward sparse regions using grid-based decomposition uniform probability distributions select non-empty grid cells. kinodynamic planning interior-exterior cell
exploration) (KPIECE) method (Sucan & Kavraki, 2012) relies multi-level grid decomposition constructed user-defined random linear projections. synergistic combination
layers planning (SyCLoP) method (Plaku, Kavraki, & Vardi, 2010) uses discrete search
531

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

low-dimensional triangular grid decomposition guide tree exploration along short region
paths goal. guided sampling tree (GUST) method (Plaku, 2015) partitions motion
tree equivalence classes relies multi-objective criteria based shortest-path distances,
selection penalties, progress made determine equivalence classes could result rapid
expansions toward goal.
path-directed subdivision tree (PDST) method (Ladd & Kavraki, 2004, 2005) relies
grid subdivision configuration space. cell decomposition keeps track
tree branches fall it. Initially, tree root vertex one cell
corresponding minimum maximum values variable. iteration, tree
branch selected expansion. cell c contains selected tree branch divided
two cells, c1 c2 , along largest dimension. tree branches c split according
boundaries c1 c2 . ensures invariant tree branch contained
entirely one cell. selected tree branch b expanded picking configuration q along b
using propagation add new branch starting q. Propagation problem-dependent could
correspond moving random direction.
propagation continues collision found maximum number steps reached.
branch split exits cell boundaries. key component PDST weighting
scheme associated cell based volume, number branches, number previous
selections. selecting tree branch, order increase coverage, priority given cells
large volumes well-explored. iteration, selected cell
c penalized order ensure cells eventually selected expansion.
necessary avoid oversampling guarantee probabilistic completeness (Ladd & Kavraki, 2005).
PDST combined artificial potential fields order expand tree
region lowest potential (Bekris & Kavraki, 2007).
3.4 Roadmap-Based Robot Motion Planning Methods
introduction PRM (Kavraki et al., 1996) shifted focus complete probabilisticallycomplete motion-planning algorithms, guarantee find solution, exists, probability approaching one time tends infinity. complete algorithms limited simple
problems 23 variables, PRM made possible efficiently solve high-dimensional problems. underlying idea PRM construct roadmap captures connectivity
(obstacle-)free configuration space. roadmap populated generating number
collision-free configurations. configuration generated sampling values variables
uniformly random. configuration discarded, results collision. Otherwise, added
roadmap. capture connectivity, neighboring roadmap configurations connected
collision-free paths. Figure 7 provides illustration roadmap created PRM. common approach compute roadmap configuration k-nearest neighbors according
distance metric. path two configurations often obtained linear interpolation.
path collision free, added edge roadmap graph. path given start
goal configuration found first connecting start goal configurations roadmap
searching roadmap graph. A* often used efficiently compute shortest roadmap
path. Additional sampling may required initial roadmap contain path
start goal.
532

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

b
b

b
b

b
b
b

b
b

b

b
b

b

b

b
b

b

goal

b

start

b
b
b

Figure 7: illustration roadmap used answer start-to-goal queries.

years, numerous strategies proposed enhance sampling PRM.
Obstacle-based PRM (OBPRM) (Amato, Bayazit, Dale, Jones, & Vallejo, 1998) seeks increase
sampling near obstacles order improve connectivity inside narrow passages. BridgePRM
(Sun, Hsu, Jiang, Kurniawati, & Reif, 2005) similar objective uses bridge test generate
samples halfway two obstacles. Machine learning used conjunction
portfolio samplers enhance sampling narrow passages (Hsu, Sanchez-Ante, & Sun, 2005).
region-sensitive adaptive PRM (RESAMPL) (Rodriguez, Thomas, Pearce, & Amato, 2006a)
uses notion entropy identify regions enhance sampling. TogglePRM (Denny &
Amato, 2013) switches free configuration space obstacle space order facilitate connections narrow passages. ANC-Spatial (Ekenna, Thomas, & Amato, 2016) uses
spatial-learning approach enhance roadmap connectivity determining appropriate connection methods roadmap vertex. PRM* (Karaman & Frazzoli, 2011) variant PRM
leads optimal solutions respect given cost function. modification surprisingly
simple, requires using variable number nearest neighbors instead fixed k.
3.5 Biomolecular Modeling Challenges Tree- Roadmap-Based Methods
tree- roadmap-based methods experience curse dimensionality several ways.
central issue concerns breadth sampling possibly high-dimensional complex variable
spaces. particular, context biomolecular modeling, decision variables
represent key, determines dimensionality complexity variable/conformation
space. decision tightly tied application setting class biomolecular systems
considered. reviewed Section 2, many adaptations selected variables
subset backbone dihedral angles (Han & Amato, 2001; Amato et al., 2003; Song & Amato,
2004; Thomas et al., 2005, 2007; Jaillet et al., 2008; Tang et al., 2008; Tapia, Tang, Thomas, &
Amato, 2007; Tapia et al., 2010; Jaillet et al., 2011; Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy et al., 2013;
Molloy & Shehu, 2013), others selected variables capture collective motions atoms
3d Cartesian space (Kim et al., 2002b, 2002a; Kirillova et al., 2008; Schuyler et al., 2009; Al-Bluwi
et al., 2013; Maximova et al., 2015). Whether values variables sampled individually
533

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

tandem a-priori compiled databases good moves (Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy et al.,
2013; Molloy & Shehu, 2013), whether diverse perturbation/sampling operators employed
make use different sets variables (Gipson, Moll, & Kavraki, 2013; Molloy & Shehu, 2016),
dimensionality size variable space remains key challenge tree- roadmapbased treatments biomolecules.
choice variables key design effective sampling perturbation operators
generating conformations satisfy set desired geometric and/or energetic constraints
biomolecular modeling problem hand. Samples obtained uniformly random low
probability low-energy region interest sought structural transition.
particular, long protein chains hundreds backbone dihedral angles, conformation
sampled random highly unlikely physically-realistic.
Biased sampling techniques used remedy issue (Amato et al., 2003; Song &
Amato, 2004), hard know priori perturbation operators effective. Recent work recognizes issue addresses offering diverse sampling operators possibly
diverse sets variables (Raveh et al., 2009; Gipson et al., 2013; Molloy & Shehu, 2016). particular, work Molloy Shehu (2016) implements probabilistic scheme selects among
rich menu operators making use angular Cartesian variables.
worth noting sampling operators may generate samples vacuum incremental modifications existing samples. earlier generations tree- roadmapbased methods typically obtained new conformations sampling values selected variables (Singh et al., 1999), recent methods generate samples neighborhoods existing parent
samples (Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy & Shehu, 2013; Maximova et al., 2016) (hence, often
used term perturbation operator). later strategy higher chance yielding physicallyrealistic conformations, perturbation operators perturb selected sample obtain new one
tend preserve good structural features new sample introducing enough change
explore new regions variable space (Olson, Hashmi, Molloy, & Shehu, 2012). context
perturbation operators, selection schemes critical control sampling. recent phenomenon
robotics-inspired methods recognition selection schemes, central
hierarchical tree-based robot motion planning (as reviewed above), employed
tree- roadmap-based methods steer biomolecular sampling regions interest (Shehu &
Olson, 2010; Molloy & Shehu, 2013; Maximova et al., 2016).
additional challenge ensuring high sampling capability biomolecules underlying complex energy surfaces encode energetic constraints. Therefore, criterion
accepting sampled conformation adding vertex list tree roadmap needs either rely a-priori set energy threshold probabilistic nature. latter setting provides
balance obtaining low-energy conformations allowing particular algorithm go
high-energy barriers needed sample conformation space (Jaillet et al., 2008,
2011; Molloy & Shehu, 2013; Devaurs et al., 2015; Molloy & Shehu, 2016).
roadmap- tree-based methods rely local planners local deformation techniques
connect neighboring conformations. tree-based methods push tree variable
space generating child conformations selected parent conformations via perturbation operators, child becomes neighbor selected parent; neighborhood function rely
notion distance variable space instead tied parent-child relationship.
methods, sampled conformation needs connected one nearest neighbors. Nearest-neighbor calculations need specification distance function conforma534

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

tions, non-trivial high-dimensional spaces. adaptations employ least Root-MeanSquared-Deviation (lRMSD), modification Euclidean distance differences due
rigid-body motions removed optimal superimposition protein conformations comparison (McLachlan, 1972). lRMSD carried Cartesian coordinate-based
instantiations. distance functions use L1 related variants defined dihedral angles.
generally challenging find computationally-efficient dynamics-integrating local planners biomolecular conformations. conformations q1 q2 nearby variable structure
space, local path encoded edge tree roadmap encode process
diffusion. local path provide evidence diffusion biomolecule q1
q2 presence thermal vibrations. readily obvious use dynamics steer
biomolecule q1 q2 . principle MD simulations employed search
paths, guarantee simulations reach q2 . biased MD simulations
employed reach q2 , simulations modify energy surface model actual
dynamics (Ma & Karplus, 1997). Moreover, corrections biased MD simulations model
actual dynamics prove computationally expensive (Ovchinnikov & Karplus, 2012) context
robotics-inspired methods evaluate thousands edges.
result, majority robotics-inspired methods biomolecular modeling employ local
planners carry linear interpolations variables conformations need
connected via tree branch roadmap edge. planners produce unrealistic conformations,
significant time spent correcting geometry ensuing energetic violations via energy
minimization. Recent work proposes complex, local planners based interpolation
instead re-formulations motion computation problem; is, local planners tree- roadmap-based methods (Molloy & Shehu, 2016). latter idea borrowed
similarly challenging setting motion planning manipulators, linear interpolation effective (Nielsen & Kavraki, 2000). making use complex local planners,
prioritized path sampling scheme needed prioritize application computationallydemanding planners promising paths order control computational cost (Nielsen &
Kavraki, 2000). work Molloy Shehu (2016) provides implementation prioritized
path sampling biomolecular modeling.

4. Robotics-Inspired Methods Equilibrium Biomolecular Structure
Dynamics
Table 1 categorizes different robotics-inspired methods robot motion planning frameworks
adapt application setups address. table comprehensive means,
may useful readers selecting focus specific applications. rest Section
describe methods greater detail, paying particular attention recent, state-of-the-art
methods showcase current capabilities robotics-inspired treatments biomolecules.
4.1 Tree-Based Methods Modeling Equilibrium Biomolecular Structure Dynamics
Tree-based methods employed model biomolecular flexibility compute conformation paths connecting given structures (Cortes et al., 2005; Shehu, 2009; Shehu & Olson, 2010;
Jaillet et al., 2011; Haspel et al., 2010). tree-based methods address decoy sampling de
novo protein structure prediction problem (Shehu & Olson, 2010; Olson, Molloy, Hendi, & Shehu,
2012; Molloy et al., 2013) map entire energy landscape pathways connecting stable
535

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

states molecular loops, peptides, proteins (Porta, Thomas, Corcho, Canto, & Perez, 2007;
Jaillet et al., 2011; Porta & Jaillet, 2013; Devaurs et al., 2015; Molloy et al., 2016). Others
focused specific flexible sub-chains, loops, rather entire protein chains (Cortes et al.,
2004, 2005; Yao, Dhanik, Marz, Propper, Kou, Liu, van den Bedem, Latombe, Halperin-Landsberg,
& Altman, 2008; Barbe, Cortes, Simeon, Monsan, Remaud-Simeon, & Andre, 2011).
Table 1: Categorization Tree- Roadmap-based Methods Application Setting
Application
Protein
Loop
Motions
Protein-Ligand
Binding

Tree-based Methods
RLG-RRT (Cortes et al., 2005; Cortes,
Jaillet, & Simeon, 2007), ML-RRT (Barbe
et al., 2011)
ML-RRT (Cortes et al., 2007)

Protein Structure
Prediction
Protein RNA
(Un)Folding

FeLTr (Shehu & Olson, 2010; Molloy
et al., 2013)

Peptide Protein
Structural
Transitions

NMA-RRT (Kirillova et al., 2008; AlBluwi et al., 2013), PathRover (Enosh,
Raveh, Furman-Schueler, Halperin, &
Ben-Tal, 2008; Raveh et al., 2009), TRRT (Jaillet et al., 2011), PDST (Haspel
et al., 2010), Sprint (Molloy & Shehu,
2013), Multi-T-RRT (Devaurs et al., 2015)
T-RRT (Jaillet et al., 2011), Multi-TRRT (Devaurs et al., 2015)

Peptide Protein Energy landscape Mapping

Roadmap-based Methods
LoopTK (Yao et al., 2008)

PCR (Singh et al., 1999; Apaydin
et al., 2001), SRS (Apaydin et al.,
2003)

SRS (Apaydin et al., 2003), PRMFP (Amato et al., 2003; Song &
Amato, 2004; Tang, Kirkpatrick,
Thomas, Song, & Amato, 2005;
Thomas et al., 2005, 2007; Tapia
et al., 2007; Tang et al., 2008; Tapia
et al., 2010), MaxFlux-PRM (Yang,
Wu, Li, Han, & Huo, 2007; Li, Yang,
Han, & Huo, 2008)
SRS (Molloy et al., 2016), Spiral (Molloy & Shehu, 2016), SoPRIM (Maximova et al., 2015)

SoPRIM (Maximova et al., 2015)

4.1.1 ODELING P ROTEIN L OOP OTIONS P ROTEIN -L IGAND ISASSOCIATION
Early adaptations RRT algorithm biomolecules focused modeling equilibrium dynamics protein loops (Cortes et al., 2005) protein-ligand interactions (Cortes et al., 2004).
instance, method presented work Cortes et al. (2005) proceeds two stages
model large-amplitude structural changes protein loop equilibrium. first stage obtains
ensemble collision-free conformations loop protein structure. achieved
Random Loop Generator RRT (RLG-RRT) algorithm, effectively samples loop conformation space satisfies kinematic closure constraints. loop divided active
passive part. passive part selected contain 6 variables, whereas active part contains
rest angular variables selected represent loop conformation. RLG-RRT algorithm
536

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

directly samples values variables active part via scheme increases probability
obtaining conformation satisfies loop closure. active part loop conformation
obtained, exact 6R inverse kinematics technique applied solve passive variables loop closure constraints. Closed loop conformations added tree
collision-free. tree run fixed amount time, goal region defined around
given goal conformation order extract many paths one execution RLG-RRT
algorithm. Conformations extracted paths subjected short energetic minimizations
order elucidate energetically-feasible, large-amplitude motions loop investigation.
Analysis extracted loop motions work Cortes et al. (2004) reveals results
comparable classic molecular modeling methods obtained performance gain
several orders magnitude. work Cortes et al. (2004) demonstrates efficacy twostage approach studying activity-regulating mobility 17-residue long loop 7
amylosucrase enzyme Neisseria polysaccharea.
Ideas similar RLG-RRT employed LoopTK (toolkit) algorithm (Yao et al., 2008)
explore closed, collision-free conformations flexible loops ranging length 5 25
amino acids. algorithm relies interplay sampling deformation obtain loops
satisfy kinematic closure constraints collision-free. sampling procedure focuses
obtaining geometrically-diverse, closed loops. deformation procedure based earlier related
work loop modeling (Lotan, van den Bedem, Deacon, & Latombe, 2004; van den Bedem, Lotan,
Latombe, & Deacon, 2005). procedure makes use null space technique explore
self-motion manifold (the constrained, closure space) around closed loop resolve steric clashes
violating closure constraints. LoopTK shown efficiently handle long loops
25 amino acids even generate biologically-interesting, calcium-binding conformations.
toolkit available https://simtk.org/home/looptk.
time demands RRT-RLG problems hundreds variables addressed Cortes
et al. (2007) proposing Manhattan-like RRT (ML-RRT) algorithm efficiently compute
paths small protein-bound ligand exit protein active site. ML-RRT borrows ideas
mechanical disassembly divides variables two groups, active passive. particular,
variables model internal rigid-body motions ligand designated active,
subspace active variables sampled RLG-RRT algorithm. variables
model internal motions amino acids protein receptors active site designated
passive, slightly perturbed hinder motions ligand. decoupling
proves effective, allows possible ensuing collisions ligand protein
addressed domino-like scheme, illustrated Figure 8.
ML-RRT shown efficiently model motions small ligands, side chains, loops,
backbone (Cortes, Le, Lehl, & Simeon, 2010; Barbe et al., 2011). work Cortes et al. (2010)
subjects paths extracted executions ML-RRT algorithm randomized path smoothing
post-processing technique. technique carried composite space parameters
resulting simultaneous motions ligand protein final path. work Barbe
et al. (2011) subjects loop conformations paths extracted ML-RRT minimization
MM energy function reveal critical, physically-realistic intermediate conformations
bottlenecks along open-to-closed loop motion Burkholderia cepacia lipase lid domain.
Adaptations robot motion planning frameworks model loop structures motions represent fraction diverse methods designed loop modeling. Interested readers referred
survey work Shehu Kavraki (2012).
537

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Figure 8: figure reproduced work Al-Bluwi et al. (2012). left panel illustrates disassembly planning problem two articulated objects. ML-RRT algorithm proposed work Cortes
et al. (2007) problem models escape ligand proteins binding site disassembly problem.
red H-shaped object left image considered ligand right image, blue sticks
left image considered flexible side chains binding site receptor protein
right image. figure reproduced permission Computer Science Review Journal.

4.1.2 ODELING P EPTIDE P ROTEIN TRUCTURAL RANSITIONS APPING
P EPTIDE E NERGY L ANDSCAPES
RLG-RRT algorithm modified work Enosh et al. (2008) model structural transitions proteins and, particular, model open close motions potassium channels. main
modification RLG-RRT algorithm Enosh et al. concerns addition energetic test
collision-free test performed deciding whether generated conformation
added tree. Several novel analysis techniques introduced. Clustering conducted
many paths obtained several executions algorithm order identify common intermediate conformations paths connecting given start goal conformations. Path alignment
employed obtain energetically-favored path among computed. schematic
method proposed Enosh et al. visualization energetically-favored path
obtained KscA protein shown Figure 9.
Another extension RRT-based algorithm work Enosh et al. (2008) presented
Raveh et al. (2009); efficient PathRover algorithm proposed modeling structural
transitions many proteins. PathRover achieves computational efficiency two main ways.
First, application many proteins made possible restricting number dihedral angles
used variables. Three strategies used identify subset dihedral angles define
variable space: careful inspection structures, relevant literature, computational tools detecting
hinge regions NMA, comparison structural changes alternative (native homologue)
structures. particular, FlexProt alignment algorithm (Shatsky, Nussinov, & Wolfson, 2002)
used compare start goal structures reveal structurally-different regions. Variables
manually restricted dihedral angles regions. Second, PathRover limits exploration
538

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Figure 9: figure reproduced work Enosh et al. (2008). schematic method
shown (a). PathRover algorithm executed multiple times extract 100 plausible paths connecting
given open closed conformations. paths clustered aligned reveal path cluster
minimal energy barrier. cluster visualized KscA protein (b), shows putative threephase motion close open conformations. figure reproduced permission
Biophysical Journal.

539

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

regions space consistent available wet-laboratory data. Branch termination criteria
employed stop tree pulled towards regions improve agreement
wet-laboratory data. integration wet-laboratory data aims circumvent known inaccuracies
modern biomolecular energy functions.
RRT-based algorithms summarized demonstrate utility RRT modeling
structural transitions proteins. particular, PathRover algorithm utilized several schemes
reduce number variables order make problem modeling structural transitions
tractable (Raveh et al., 2009). work Haspel et al. (2010) continued spirit via clever,
reduced representations large proteins. contrast, work Simeon Cortes labs credited
introducing RRT-based algorithms biomolecular modeling focused instead techniques
enhance sampling. Transition-RRT (T-RRT) algorithm proposed Jaillet et al. (2008)
shown particularly effective regard.
T-RRT bi- multi-tree variants recently proposed explore obtain comprehensive maps energy landscapes small peptides, dialanine Met-Enkephalin (Jaillet et al., 2011; Devaurs et al., 2015). main modification baseline RRT algorithm
T-RRT concerns introduction acceptance criterion state transition test based
Metropolis criterion. New conformations added tree pass transition test (hence
name, T-RRT). goal T-RRT steer tree towards exploration low-energy regions
order map energy minima potential energy surface relaxing transition test
needed cross energy barriers may trap exploration particular local minimum.
dynamic modification state transition test makes use reactive temperature scheme.
Metropolis criterion, effective temperature effectively controls height energy barriers crossed two consecutive conformations. T-RRT, temperature increased
number attempts pull tree towards low-energy regions reaches user-specified
threshold; is, number failures grow tree taken indication presence
energy barrier, effective temperature increased order relax state transition test.
soon successful edge added tree, temperature lowered pre-specified
factor order resume overall bias pulling tree towards local minima. effect
reactive temperature scheme search balanced unexplored regions lowenergy regions variable space. Application T-RRT work Jaillet et al. (2011) shows
algorithm map entire known energy landscape dialanine peptide run
exploration mode. Another setting, T-RRT used obtain paths connect discovered
minima, shows recovered transitions known stable states dialanine strong
agreement transitions known experiment affirmed simulation studies.
work addresses issue limited sampling goal obtain accurate representations energy landscapes longer peptides, Met-Enkephalin (Devaurs et al., 2015).
T-RRT algorithm used Devaurs et al. reveal conformation paths connecting
already-identified meta-stable states. states identified EA known Basin Hopping (BH), shown effectively sample local minima energy surfaces
biomolecules (Olson et al., 2012). work Devaurs et al., BH operates dihedral angles
provides sample-based, discrete representation energy surface peptide. local
minima clustered reveal wide basins corresponding meta-stable states.
variant T-RRT algorithm, referred Multi-T-RRT, proposed Devaurs et al.
connect identified states. algorithm builds n single trees, rooted conformation
representative unique meta-stable state. algorithm proceeds iterations, iteration
540

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Figure 10: figure, reproduced work Devaurs et al. (2015), graph obtained single
run multi-T-RRT cycles projected key dihedral angles top panel. algorithm seeded
four meta-stable states Met-Enkephalin peptide, drawn pink triangles, squares, circles.
states capture unfolded state, folded state, two intermediates (shown bottom panel). Costs
various paths shown table bottom panel. figure reproduced permission IEEE
Trans Nano BioScience 2015.

randomly selecting one n trees expansion conformation q. conformation
nearest q n 1 trees identified, within extension step-size,
q merges two trees. Iterations continue trees merged graph. graph queried
minimum-cost paths connecting states interest. identified meta-stable states
minimum-cost paths connecting states found comparable reported
studies employ computationally-demanding exploration strategies (Devaurs et al., 2015).
representative result information extracted combination BH
Multi-T-RRT shown Figure 10.
One limitation readily applying T-RRT variants obtain similar, detailed characterization proteins rather short peptides dimensionality conformation space.
work Jaillet et al. (2011), space dimensions due limited number dihedral
angles small peptides, dialanine Met-Enkephalin. Detail, desired possible
characterizations short peptides, needs sacrificed order model large-scale structural transitions proteins. NMA-RRT (Kirillova et al., 2008), PDST (Haspel et al., 2010),
Sprint (Molloy & Shehu, 2013) present three different algorithms make use representations
reduced detail model large-scale structural transitions proteins.
Normal Mode Analysis (NMA) used obtain larger-scale moves (low-frequency modes revealed NMA conformation) (Kirillova et al., 2008). moves employed
generate new conformations RRT framework. NMA-RRT algorithm proposed Kirillova et al. (2008) essentially conducts RRT search low-dimensional variable space
541

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

low-frequency modes. Since normal modes provided NMA conformation
allow get local minimum represented conformation, NMA needs repeated
regularly RRT search order explore breadth conformation space.
computationally demanding, application NMA-RRT limited extraction minimumcost paths connecting two conformations interest rather comprehensive map energy
landscape connectivity proteins. work Kirillova et al. shows precious information extracted regarding structural transitions proteins, adenylate kinase, even
focusing motions largely driven normal modes. complementary study minimal
energy paths adenylate kinase via NMA (Maragakis & Karplus, 2005) shows modes
sufficient capture structural transition open closed structures protein; known wet-lab structures found within 3.0Aof mode-based minimal energy
pathways (Maragakis & Karplus, 2005).
recent extension NMA-RRT aims reduce computational demands algorithm.
extension employs reduced representation protein chain based tripeptides
employs NMA conformations reduced representations. reactive temperature scheme
T-RRT employed broaden sampling capture large-scale motions connecting significantly
different structural states large proteins several hundred amino acids (Al-Bluwi et al., 2013).
Employing reduced representations expanded applicability tree-based algorithms
treating large biomolecules. PDST algorithm adapted Haspel et al. (2010) model
transition two structures interest large proteins 200 amino acids.
assumption made secondary structures unfold sought transition, largely
valid modeling domain motions proteins. assumption, backbone dihedral
angles loops connecting secondary structures selected variables.
work Haspel et al. (2010), bias scheme used 10% iterations steer
tree towards goal conformation. bias scheme employs Euclidean distance
feature vector representations conformations tree. Given conformation, corresponding
feature vector contains Euclidean distances centers mass secondary structure units.
Conformations evaluated detailed coarse-grained energy function combines terms
energy function used work Shehu et al. (2009) Amber ff03 energy function.
sampled conformation evaluated energy set threshold 100 kcal/mol
energy start conformation, conformation subjected 20 steps steepest descent
retained energy decreases threshold. rather coarse energetic
constraint, paths collected 100 runs algorithm reach goal conformation
less time methods based Simulated Annealing, reveal credible motions consistent
experimental data large, well-characterized proteins GroEL (Haspel et al., 2010).
Sprint algorithm proposed Molloy Shehu (2013) uses complementary approach
simplifying search space explored paths connecting given structures medium-size proteins.
Sprint addresses issue sampling high-dimensional variable spaces employing popular
idea de novo structure prediction. fragment replacement technique used divide
protein chain bundles consecutive dihedral angles, values bundle fragment
sampled a-priori constructed database fragment configurations known, native protein
structures. fragment replacement technique used expand tree every iteration.
work Molloy Shehu (2013) adapts EST framework via expansion
procedure model structural transitions small- medium-size proteins, Fragment Monte
Carlo Tree Exploration (FeLTr) algorithm proposed Shehu Olson (2010) uses related con542

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

cepts sample space near-native protein conformations purpose de novo structure
prediction small proteins.
Sprint FeLTr, state-transition test used steer tree towards low-energy conformations time; is, probabilistic, Metropolis-like criterion used determine whether
child conformation added tree. FeLTr (Shehu & Olson, 2010) fixed
scaling parameter (analogous fixed effective temperature) used Metropolis-like criterion, Sprint (Molloy & Shehu, 2013) integrates reactive temperature scheme order allow
tree go high-energy regions low-energy routes found thus expand
exploration capability. reactive temperature scheme Sprint slightly different
T-RRT (Jaillet et al., 2008). T-RRT effective temperature increased decreased
fixed amounts, Sprint moves temperature along proportional cooling scheme often employed
Simulated Annealing Monte Carlo methods (Shehu et al., 2009). Upon failures expand tree,
temperature moves next value cooling scheme; upon successes, temperature goes
next value scheme.
FeLTr Sprint operationalize idea easier push rather pull
tree conformation space good moves available compiled priori generate
energetically-feasible child conformations selected parent conformations tree.
work Molloy Shehu (2013) tree rooted given start conformation
goal get within tolerance region given goal conformation, work Shehu
Olson (2010) tree rooted extended conformation, termination criterion compromise desired number low-energy conformations running time.
central idea Sprint FeLTr growth tree controlled via
selection mechanism; iteration, conformation tree selected expansion.
selection penalizes tree growing towards regions conformation space
oversampled, thus resulting enhanced sampling conformation space. Two discretization
layers employed. FeLTr, first layer maps conformations tree 1d grid whose
cells energy levels width 2 kcal/mol. Sprint, first layer maps conformations 1d
grid based lRMSD goal conformation. second layer algorithms maps
conformations geometric projection. second layer 3d grid, conformations
associated 3 shape-based global coordinates (Shehu & Olson, 2010).
selection mechanism uses discretization layers. First, selects energy level according probability distribution function. latter defined weights associated energy
levels according weighting function. Different weighting functions analyzed
strong global energetic bias needs order reproduce native structure (Molloy et al.,
2013). energy level selected, cells geometric projection grid belong conformations selected energy level analyzed. second weighting function cells grid
biases selecting cell selected many times and/or already many conformations it. cell selected, conformation selected expansion uniformly
random, since conformations cell energetically- geometrically-indistinguishable.
Extensions FeLTr explored effect different weighting functions
discretization layers employment different projection coordinates (Molloy et al., 2013;
Olson et al., 2012). Different coarse-grained energy functions considered state-of-the-art
de novo structure prediction, including Rosetta suite energy functions, employed
framework directly compared steer search towards near-native conformations (Molloy et al., 2013). Molloy Shehu (2013) investigate impact different
543

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

projection schemes selection mechanisms diversity energetic profiles Sprintextracted paths context computing structural transitions.
Applications Sprint different start goal structure pairs calmodulin adenylate
kinase proteins show algorithm able find paths reach goal conformation (Molloy
& Shehu, 2013). Soft global biasing schemes found provide right compromise
tree depth (that is, lower energies) diversity paths (that is, geometrically-diverse conformations). Detailed energetic structural analysis computed paths two hallmark proteins,
calmodulin adenylate kinase, reveals Sprint yields accurate characterizations
structural transitions proteins. Energetic profiles extracted paths indicate presence
high-energy regions need crossed specific transitions calmodulin, agreement
wet-laboratory characterizations. Analysis adenylate kinase shows known intermediate
structures protein present conformation paths computed Sprint (Molloy &
Shehu, 2013).
4.2 Roadmap-Based Methods Modeling Equilibrium Biomolecular Structure
Dynamics
Roadmap-based methods employed model protein-ligand binding (Singh et al., 1999),
protein RNA folding unfolding (Song & Amato, 2004; Chiang et al., 2007; Chiang, Hsu, &
C., 2010), protein structural transitions (Molloy & Shehu, 2016; Maximova et al., 2015).
4.2.1 ODELING P ROTEIN -L IGAND B INDING
adaptation roadmap-based motion planning framework protein-ligand binding
Singh et al. (1999) first occurrence robotics-inspired treatments biomolecular structure
dynamics. adaptation simplistic provided key design issues replicated extended many robotics researchers. One key simplifications protein
receptor kept rigid, variables interest allowing model rigid-body
motions ligand around receptor internal motions ligand. Small ligands
considered, 6 + p variables allow modeling motions go dozen.
Sampling proceeds uniformly random 6 + p variables, ligand configurations added
roadmap pass geometric energetic criterion. geometric criterion ensures ligand
configurations within predefined distance center mass receptor.
energetic criterion probabilistic: two dynamically-updated thresholds, Emin Emax
values, corresponding minimum maximum energy values sampled configurations,
recorded. Ligand configurations energy higher Emax rejected. configurations
retained probability (Emax E(q))/(Emax Emin ). energy function incorporates
terms evaluate internal energy ligand configuration well terms evaluating
interactions ligand configuration rigid protein receptor.
Retained ligand configurations embedded nearest-neighbor graph, using lRMSD measure distance two ligand configurations user-set parameter, k, number
nearest neighbors. simple local planner interpolating p + 6 variables two neighboring
configurations used estimate feasibility q q 0 q 0 q edges generating consecutive configurations. Consecutive configurations qi generated linear interpolation planner
connect q q 0 distance two consecutive configurations generated series higher 1A. q q 0 q 0 q edges added roadmap qi
544

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

configurations energies Emax . Weights added retained edges follows:
0

w(q q ) =

s1
X

log[P (qi qi+1 )]

i=0


P (qi qi+1 ) =

e(Ei+1 Ei )/(KB )
(e(Ei+1 Ei )/(KB ) + e(Ei1 Ei )/(KB ) )

equations, qi1 , qi , qi+1 three consecutive configurations corresponding
energies Ei1 , Ei , Ei+1 , KB Boltzmann constant, effective temperature.
weight path qstart
qgoal , connects start configuration goal configuration,
sum weights edges it. weight path initiated unbound configuration terminating bound configuration estimates association rate (the cost
ligand approaching binding protein receptor). weight reverse path estimates
disassociation rate (the cost ligand leaving binding site diffusing space).
resulting roadmap represents distribution energetically-credible paths ligand approaching binding receptor. work Singh et al. (1999), bound configuration
ligand p+6 variable space presumed known, RMSD-based clustering
sampled lowest-energy ligand configurations employed reveal likely bound candidates.
Analysis reveals true bound configuration indeed present top-populated clusters;
however, many false positives reported, well. Weights paths terminating initiated
lowest-energy ligand configurations analyzed order determine characteristics used discriminate true false positives. Paths terminating true,
bound configurations found high association rates; reverse paths found
high disassociation rates. important result elucidates effective binders
allow ligand reach lowest interaction energy trap binding site via
high-energy barriers.
4.2.2 ODELING P ROTEIN RNA (U N )F OLDING
Singh et al. (1999) provided much needed template served foundation many
robotics-inspired treatments biomolecules. particular, suite roadmap-based algorithms
extensions designed Amato lab model unfolding small proteins. review
roadmap-based methods study molecular motions Amato lab available work
Tapia et al. (2010), whereas review roadmap-based methods specific protein folding
problem presented work Moll, Schwartz, Kavraki (2008). seminal contribution
category Probabilistic Conformation Roadmap (PCR) algorithm (Apaydin et al., 2001),
builds upon template presented Singh et al. (1999) study protein folding.
PCR addresses complex application domain, number variables needed model
intrinsic flexibility protein chains easily reach 100 more. PCR extensions
followed, notably Amato lab, variables employed subset backbone
dihedral angles protein chain (Amato et al., 2003; Song & Amato, 2004; Tang et al., 2005;
Thomas et al., 2005, 2007; Tapia et al., 2007; Tang et al., 2008; Tapia et al., 2010). variable
spaces, uniform random sampling ineffective likely result conformations severe
internal collisions. reason, work Amato lab PCR-based algorithms gradually
545

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

shifted sampling strategies based incremental perturbations given native/folded conformation memory folded conformation lost. Specifically, backbone dihedral angles
folded conformation perturbed small amounts use Gaussian distribution
minimum number conformations obtained category (0 100% 10% increments)
percentage native contacts. lower number native contacts conformation,
likely conformation belong unfolded state. acceptance criterion
sampled conformations work Singh et al. (1999), energy function different,
measures internal energy protein chain. function contains terms favoring hydrogen
bonds, disulfide bonds, hydrophobic interactions.
sampled conformations pass energetic/acceptance criterion embedded
nearest-neighbor graph, number nearest neighbor conformation k specified user.
contrast original PCR algorithm, directed (u, v) edges graph weighted based
E(u)E(v)

Boltzmann-related Metropolis criterionas in: P(u,v) = e KB , E(.) energy
conformation, KB Boltzmann constant, a-priori set temperature determining
height energy barriers crossed edge. early formulation edge weights, reactive
temperature schemes employed later tree- roadmap-based algorithms structural
transitions. Instead, user-controlled parameter determines great extent ability
algorithm navigate underlying energy surface.
works Song Amato (2004) Thomas et al. (2005), N best paths end
folded conformation start conformations 0 native contacts extracted analyzed.
Analysis paths shown that, despite several design decisions intended simplify
protein folding problem, PCR-based algorithms predict order secondary structure formation. Agreement wet-laboratory data validated general usage PCR-based algorithms
provide coarse-grained treatment folding unfolding pathways protein chains.
works Amato collaborators show applicability PCR-based algorithms study
RNA folding unfolding (Tapia et al., 2007; Tang et al., 2008; Tapia et al., 2010) .
sampling strategy incremental perturbations effective protein chains
60 amino acids (Song & Amato, 2004) scales poorly longer chains (Thomas et al., 2005).
Ensuing work improves sampling protein chains 110 amino acids reducing
number variables modeled represent conformations (Thomas et al., 2007). Specifically, rigidity analysis employed detect least-constrained regions given structure. dihedral angles
belonging regions selected often perturbation sampling stage. modification shown effective revealing subtle folding differences protein G two
sequence variants. particular, modification shown promising capturing
dynamic events proteins beyond folding study large-scale conformational changes involved
structural transitions calmodulin protein. Related ideas employed researchers compute temperature-dependent optimal folding paths peptides proteins (Yang
et al., 2007; Li et al., 2008). MaxFlux-PRM algorithm proposed Yang et al. (2007)
study structural transitions dialanine peptide folding -hairpin shown Li
et al. (2008) capable predicting folding pathways engrailed homeodomain protein.
work Amato lab focused exploiting conformation roadmap extract
quantities summarizing folding kinetics protein RNA molecules. Tapia et al. (2007) introduce
two new analysis techniques, Map-based Master Equation (MME) Map-based MC (MMC)
technique. work shows treating roadmap map folding landscape
546

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

exploited estimate kinetic metrics typically extracted MD simulation studies.
Metropolis MC simulations conducted roadmap, moving roadmap vertices
observing edge probabilities roadmap. Different statistics calculated
MMC walks, including folding rates population kinetics. Tang et al. (2008) show statistics
summarizing RNA folding predict well relative gene expression rate wild-type MS2
phage RNA three mutants, good agreement wet-laboratory data.
4.2.3 TOCHASTIC ROADMAP IMULATION ARKOV TATE ODELS ODELING
P ROTEIN RNA (U N ) FOLDING P ROTEIN TRUCTURAL RANSITIONS
idea reliable statistics extracted molecular conformation roadmaps presented earlier Latombe colleagues (Apaydin et al., 2003). stochastic roadmap simulation (SRS) framework formalized relation key analogy roadmap Markov
state model (MSM); concept stochastic roadmap probabilistic edges presented
earlier (Song & Amato, 2000), analogy MSM went missing till 2003 formalization Latombe colleagues (Apaydin et al., 2003). latter laid bare analogies stochastic roadmap would later referred point-based MSM.
MSM, states MSM single-conformation vertices stochastic roadmap,
probabilistically-weighted edges connecting vertices roadmap state-to-state transitions
MSM. analogy brought focus stochastic roadmap better encodes stochastic nature biomolecular motions, analogy MSM could even used extract
interesting summary statistics regarding physics-driven stochastic processes.
addition recognizing biased random walks carried roadmap
employed extract statistics interest (Tapia et al., 2007), SRS-MSM analogy highlights
effective, algebra-based techniques (Markov chain) transition state theory employed
extract average statistics without launching single simulation (or random walk roadmap).
Folding rates, pfold values, values, estimates kinetics, transition rates,
obtained without needing perform many random walks in-order propagation transition
probabilities. analogy stochastic roadmap point-based MSM shown result
correctly-predicted pfold values small proteins modeled secondary structure level
612 variables (Apaydin, Brutlag, Hsu, & Latombe, 2002; Apaydin et al., 2003). work
demonstrated transition state ensemble (the set conformations pfold =0.5), folding
rates, values could predicted 16 different proteins fraction computational
time would needed framework launching numerous MC simulations (Chiang, Apaydin,
Brutlag, Hsu, & Latombe, 2006; Chiang et al., 2007) .
SRS-MSM analogy permits interesting mathematics, practical issues
ensure transition matrix prohibitive size allow solving linear algebra equations
addressed case-by-case basis. formalization presented Apaydin et al. (2003)
discuss practical design decisions group conformations states
estimate transition probabilities two sub-ensembles, rather mathematics
would possible analogy stochastic roadmap MSM. Analogies cellbased MSMs, states homogeneous sub-ensembles conformations rather single
conformations need addressing practical issues regarding organize conformations states
associate transition probabilities states.
547

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Since seminal work Apaydin et al. (2003), analogies SRS cell-based MSMs
largely limited, partly due lack clear objectives design decisions
general ability transform roadmap MSM manageable size. instance,
fundamental assumption conformations obtained via MD simulation
temperature , probability edge representing transition vertex u vertex v
could measured via Boltzmann-related Metropolis criterion e(E(v)E(u))/(KB ) . realization allowed Apaydin, Latombe, colleagues see clear connection stochastic (probabilistic) roadmap structures point-based MSM, vertices seen states
MSM edges vertices roadmap transitions states MSM. However, practical considerations convert single conformation vertex probabilities
state-state transition probabilities discussed.
issue associate probabilities first place conformations sampled via
non-MD algorithms discussed. Two groups researchers started operationalizing
seminal ideas presented Apaydin et al. (2003). Work Latombe colleagues focused either point-based MSMs summarizing uncovering MD-simulated dynamics
synthetic small peptides via cell-based MSMs (Chiang et al., 2007, 2010). Complementary work Shehu lab focused non-MD approaches extracting average statistics
model compare transitions healthy aberrant forms disease-participating, small-
medium-size proteins (Molloy et al., 2016).
Chiang et al. (2010) offer novel representation states individual conformations (Apaydin et al., 2003; Singhal, Snow, & Pande, 2004) even disjoint regions conformation space
(Ozkan, Dill, & Bahar, 2002; Chodera, Singhal, Pande, Dill, & Swope, 2007) (as cell-based
MSMs) instead overlapping probabilistic distributions conformation space.
distribution relies key recognition single conformation contain enough information uniquely mapped state leads presence hidden states
referred Markov Dynamics Model (MDM) rather MSM (Chiang et al., 2010).
MDM, emission probabilities hidden states measure probability conformation belongs state. transition emission probabilities estimated trajectories
conformations obtained many MD simulation trajectories. principled criterion based
ability model predict long-timescale kinetics allows discriminating possible MDMs
selecting optimal one. MDM embedded conformations obtained MD trajectories simulating folding fast-folding villin headpiece subdomain (HP-35 NleNle) shown
Figure 11. MDM presents highly-interpretable discrete kinetic model folding
small sub-domain, built 400 MD trajectories, 1s long. Figure 11 shows
states, 7, 12, 13, 15 18, frequently-visited states significantly influence
long-term dynamics.
Molloy et al. (2016) present strategies embed conformations sampled via non-MD method
cell-based MSM. ability formulate cell-based MSM relies dense sampling
conformation space interest. latter provides significantly challenging MD setting
even robotics-inspired setting. Instead, complementary work Shehu lab EAs
used obtain rich ensemble local minima conformations healthy variant sequences
given protein (Clausen & Shehu, 2015; Clausen et al., 2015). conformations organized
states via simple lRMSD-based clustering scheme. nearest-neighbor graph imposed
states, additional lRMSD constraint imposed connect nearby states
via edge. assumption made transitions possible nearby states, prob548

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Figure 11: figure, reproduced work Chiang et al. (2010), (a) shows MSM connecting
twenty identified states villin headpiece peptide. size node MSM proportional
probability corresponding state stationary distribution. width edge proportional
transition probability corresponding states. States probability < 0.01 stationary
distribution, self-transitions, edges transition probability < 0.002 drawn avoid cluttering.
initial conformations likely belong state 12, native conformation likely
belong state 15. (b) Representative conformations shown states 7, 12, 13, 15, 18.
residues forming important helix 1 villin headpiece peptide drawn red. (c) likely state
transition sequences states 12 15 shown here. figure reproduced Bioinformatics
Journals terms Creative Commons Attribution Non-Commercial License.

abilities transitions estimated via Boltzmann-like probability. latter makes use
concept energy state. Several schemes employed determine energy
state, ranging minimum average value energies conformations grouped
state.
549

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Figure 12: figure reproduced work Molloy et al. (2016). Panel (a) shows two wet-laboratory
structures representative structural states H-Ras catalytic domain. H-Ras switches
two states regulate biological activity cell. loop regions change
localized shown red blue. reactant (GTP) product (GDP) drawn bind
H-Ras. Panel (b) shows two-dimensional projections probed energy surface H-Ras wildtype (WT)
oncogenic Q61L variant. Sampled conformations projected top two principal components
(PC) obtained via Principal Component Analysis sampled conformations. color-coding follows
Amber ff12SB internal energy values all-atom structure corresponding sampled conformation.
minimum-cost paths obtained querying stochastic roadmap constructed sampled
conformations shown, well. costs paths shown table panel (c). average
number edges possible paths obtained treating roadmap MSM.
actual energy profiles minimum-cost paths obtained WT Q61L variant shown panel
(d). figure reproduced permission Robotica 2016.

result process stochastic roadmap used answer lowest-cost path
queries, traditionally case roadmap-based methods, well yield average statistics,
average number edges transition, via analogy stochastic roadmap
MSM. path smoothing algorithm based conjugate peak refinement technique (Fischer &
Karplus, 1992) provides detail state-state paths improves energetic profile.
average statistics, direct measurements transition rates due lack timescale information non-MD methods, allow conducting comparisons wildtype (WT) variant (mutated) sequences proteins interest. work Molloy et al. (2016), statistics
employed obtain structural explanation role specific mutations biological
activity two proteins implicated human disorders. Figure 12 showcases representative
results application SRS-based approach work Molloy et al. WT
Q61L variant H-Ras protein. Ras sequence mutations implicated various human
cancers (Karnoub & Weinberg, 2008).
550

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Comparison energy landscapes, costs minimum-cost paths, energy profiles
paths, expected number edges paths H-Ras sequence Figure 12 provides structural explanation impact Q61L mutation biological activity
enzyme. mutation introduces energy barrier states, barrier
increases cost minimum cost path number expected edges transition
paths. Taken together, results suggest Q61L mutation, preserving stability
states, cannot form transition state mimic, agreement wet-laboratory
studies (Gremer, Gilsbach, Ahmadian, & Wittinghofer, 2008; Gibbs, Schaber, Allard, Sigal, & Scolnick, 1988).
4.2.4 DDRESSING L IMITED AMPLING ROADMAP -BASED ETHODS ODELING
P ROTEIN TRUCTURAL RANSITIONS
Sampling remains key issue adaptations roadmap-based methods biomolecular modeling.
generally focus robotics-inspired methods demonstrating ability
reproduce experimental knowledge qualitatively even quantitatively specific systems
investigation, general applicability largely sacrificed. instance, roadmapbased methods applied model discrete secondary structure formation events protein folding
unfolding largely applicable model folding transition events proteins
150 amino acids states sought bridged transition may farther
10A away each-other. Strategies reduce number variables control
dimensionality variable space important ramifications. instance, rigidity-based
techniques base conclusions flexible regions analysis specific
structure. NMA techniques suffer similar issue, regular application NMA sampled
conformations adds computational time demands algorithm. techniques make
assumptions regions participate particular transition event rule
possibility potentially complex, cooperative events. Others bundle variables together
obtain values pre-compiled databases make similar assumptions types
structural changes facilitate transition.
Sampling remain challenge, two complementary directions explored.
first direction values broad applicability specific improvements. Molloy Shehu (2016)
propose community needs benchmark testing dataset baseline approach
specific improvements extensions evaluated. particular, work ignores
system-specific insights variable sampling schemes effective
others instead compiles broad set variables sampling/perturbation operators
selected via probabilistic scheme. Different schemes employed different stages
roadmap-based method based distance conformations need connected
size biomolecule investigation. general baseline implementation shows
comparable performance system-specific methods promises improvements
guarantee baseline performance broad set biomolecules problem instances. Related
ideas building concept move selector presented Gipson et al. (2013).
second direction sacrifices broad applicability interest improving predictive
capability roadmap-based methods point reliable hypotheses formulated guide wet-laboratory experimentation. Maximova et al. (2015) recognize roadmap-based
methods operate de novo setting instead exploit rich set wet-laboratory
551

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Figure 13: figure reproduced work Maximova et al. (2015). left panel shows
schematic summarizes paths within small energetic threshold minimum-cost path connecting
structure pairs interest calmodulin. Analysis paths reveals known, wet-laboratory structures
mediate transitions interest. PDB ids mediating structures shown along paths.
right panel shows successive structures minimum-cost paths found transitions calmodulin
structure PDB id 1CLL PDB id 2F3Y structure PDB id 1CLL
PDB id 1NWD. Numbers indicate model number within NMR entry. figure reproduced
permission IEEE Society 2015.

structures determine variable space interest. particular, SoPRIM algorithm proposed
Maximova et al. subjects wet-laboratory structures different sequences protein statistical multivariate analysis determine variables represent collective motions atoms. Sampling
focuses space variables multiscaling technique converts samples all-atom structures local minima Amber ff14SB energy function. samples embedded
roadmap, distance constraints ensure edges placed neighboring samples.
Edges weighted based concept minimum cost, recording energetic increases.
additional contrast existing roadmap-based treatments, work Maximova et al.
(2015) yields minimum-cost path connecting given start given goal structure,
allows extracting additional paths similar costs. concept tours employed, based
related work robotics. tours allow investigate specific hypotheses regarding participation known meta-stable structures transition. set structures specified,
minimum-cost tours consider subsets orders structures reported. Analysis
tours costs higher specific threshold minimum-cost path reveals precious
information regarding important function-regulation transitions several proteins, including Ras
calmodulin. summary result shown Figure 13.
Figure 13 extracts several energetically-credible paths representing various, equiprobable
routes transitions calmodulin open, unbound state (represented structure PDB
id 1CLL) two different, closed peptide protein-bound states (represented structures
PDB id 2F3Y 1NWD). schematic summary paths Figure 13 highlights
open-to-closed transitions calmodulin may make use calcium-bound structure
(PDB id 1CFD). Indeed, paths go structure higher energetic cost. different
intermediate structure emerges analysis paths. structure (under PDB id 2K0E)
binds calcium slightly different PDB id 1CFD. succession structures shown 13 makes clear domain collapse, re-arrangement, partial unfolding
helix links N- C-terminal domains calmodulin gradual, captured various structures NMR ensemble PDB id 2K0E. result good agreement
552

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

wet-laboratory study work Gsponer, Christodoulou, Cavalli, Bui, Richter, Dobson,
Vendruscolo (2008), which, addition contributing NMR entry PDB id 2K0E
Protein Data Bank, concludes correlated motions within 2K0E Ca(2+)-CaM state
direct structural fluctuations toward complex-like substates (Gsponer et al., 2008).
wet-laboratory study Gsponer et al. (2008) restricted MLCK binding CaM, results
obtained SoPRIM algorithm (Maximova et al., 2015) suggest mechanism observed Gsponer et al. (2008) prepares CaM binding peptides (the C-terminal Domain
Petunia Glutamate Decarboxylase 1NWD IQ domain 2F3Y). work Maximova et al. (2015) points general mechanism apo-to-closed/complexed dynamics
calmodulin, correlated motions within calcium-bound state direct fluctuations
population shift protein peptide-bound states.

5. Outstanding Challenges Directions Research
Robotics-inspired methods becoming powerful diverse algorithmic strategies
problems address biomolecular modeling. survey focused treeand roadmap-based methods modeling protein-ligand binding, protein de novo structure prediction, protein RNA folding unfolding, structural transitions peptides proteins,
energy landscape mapping, methods building related ideas efficiently map ligand
migration channel networks dynamic proteins (Lin & Song, 2011; Na & Song, 2015) even
model antibody aggregation processes (Hoard, Jacobson, Manavi, & Tapia, 2016).
attempted provide broad deep survey robotics-inspired methods biomolecular modeling, exhaustive survey possible. particular sub-domain interface Robotics
computational structural biology rapidly progressing, demonstrated increasing number
adaptations applications showcased survey earlier, related reviews roboticsinspired methods (Al-Bluwi et al., 2012; Gipson, Hsu, Kavraki, & Latombe, 2012). survey
showcases, several algorithmic challenges remain. provide partial list challenges prospects future research.
5.1 Problem-Specific versus General Treatments
pressing need community benchmarks. work largely driven
specific biological systems problems interest, data-driven research often resulted
specific design decisions easily transferable systems problems.
instance, key decisions reduce dimensionality variable space design compliant sampling strategies perturbation operators specific problem instance may
applicable another problem. realization need baseline, general treatments benchmarks leading researchers towards non-specific treatments establish benchmarks baseline
performance. Better sharing problem instances, metrics, algorithms known baseline
performance key allow researchers build existing work expedite progress.
5.2 Sampling
growing realization sampling remain central issue, despite clever reduced representations sampling strategies. community researchers adapting robot motion planning treatments biomolecular modeling successful integrating important knowledge
553

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

biomolecules model selection, sampling strategies, energetic evaluations, community largely remained isolated complementary work AI stochastic optimization
continuous, non-linear variable spaces. particular, growing body work evolutionary computation community optimization complex fitness landscapes. ideas
community successfully employed de novo structure prediction (Shehu, 2013)
mapping protein energy landscapes (Clausen & Shehu, 2015; Clausen et al., 2015; Sapin, Carr,
De Jong, & Shehu, 2016). ideas beginning incorporated robotics-inspired
treatments biomolecular dynamics (Molloy et al., 2016). Better awareness integration
effective practices communities dealing similarly challenging high-dimensional problems likely address issues sampling lead powerful robotics-inspired treatments.
context, see great opportunity AI researchers make contributions sampling-based
treatments biomolecular dynamics.
5.3 Decorrelations Paths
particular, applications tree- roadmap-based methods modeling structural transitions
biomolecules, path correlation issue. Path correlations potentially skew statistics
interest even yield incorrect conclusions structural transition. culprit treebased methods bias applied steer conformation tree goal conformation.
Even multiple executions tree-based method likely result similar paths.
extent, source path correlations addressed. instance, Molloy Shehu (2013)
makes use additional projection layer steer tree towards under-sampled regions
conformation space. shown improve path diversity. Yet another culprit shared
tree- roadmap-based methods density sampling. instance, undersampling specific
regions may lead conclusion region energetically favorable biomolecule
hand. investigation needed quantify reduce path correlations robotics-inspired
methods. direction ripe cross-fertilization ideas different sub-communities
AI.
5.4 Injection Dynamics
common criticism robotics-inspired methods essentially geometric treatments
biomolecules. extent geometric treatments accepted modeling biomolecular structure, seen inadequate modeling biomolecular dynamics. Modeling dynamics
largely seen exclusive MD simulation frameworks. somewhat colloquial simplistic characterization robotics-inspired methods, biomolecular dynamics nothing
robot motion planning. characterization overcome pointing superficial
analogies used inspire robotics researchers, deeper analogies exploited
shown impact selection models, variables, fast forward inverse
kinematics, effective sampling strategies. worth noting latter exclusively
domain robotics-inspired researchers. contrary, issues effective variable selection
representation, variation operators, employment operators sampling strategies,
others broad interest AI researchers working optimization problems part modeling
abstract, mechanical, biological systems.
various places, survey highlighted robotics-inspired methods capable
reproducing wet-laboratory knowledge data providing novel findings direct
554

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

experimentation wet laboratories. Still, valid criticism robotics-inspired methods
edges trees roadmaps provide detailed view diffusion
two conformations connect. survey points Section 4 several challenges
integrating MD trajectories robotics-inspired framework, important community think
ways effectively. Injection ideas AI community large may prove beneficial
here. growing body work computational biophysics pointing effective frameworks
biomolecular dynamics integrate thousands short MD trajectories MSMs capture
biomolecular dynamics. Cross-fertiziliation ideas AI biophysics communities
likely prove fruitful explicitly integrating MD robotics-inspired methods.
5.5 Beyond Path Computations: Roadmaps MSMs
survey highlights Section 4, MSMs become popular computational biophysics literature organize extract statistics many, independent MD simulations
biomolecular folding structural transitions (Jayachandran, Vishal, & Pande, 2006; Chodera
et al., 2007; Noe & Fischer, 2008; Prinz, Keller, & Noe, 2011a; Noe, Doose, Daidone, Lollmann,
Sauer, Chodera, & Smith, 2011; Perez-Hernandez, Paul, Giorgino, De Fabritiis, & Noe, 2013; Weber, Jack, & Pande, 2013; Deng, Dai, & Levy, 2013; Chodera & Noe, 2014; Malmstrom, Lee,
Van Wart, & Amaro, 2014; Song & Zhuang, 2014; Shukla, Hernandez, Weber, & Pande, 2015).
Several survey articles dedicated reviewing MSM-based treatments biomolecular dynamics (Pande, Beachamp, & Bowman, 2010; Gipson et al., 2012; Maximova et al., 2016) review MSMbased treatments biomolecular dynamics. Works Chiang et al. (2006), Chiang et al. (2007),
Chiang et al. (2010), Molloy et al. (2016) provide important first step integration
MSMs analysis conformation spaces probed via robotics-inspired algorithms. Chiang et al. (2010) Molloy et al. (2016) address issues convert roadmaps
MSMs, many others remain, including definition structural states, possible undersampling specific states, feedback mechanisms address undersampling, rigorous calculation transition
probabilities. issues contended computational biophysics community, initial treatments emerged (Singhal et al., 2004; Singhal & Pande, 2005; Prinz, Wu,
Sarich, Keller, Senne, Held, Chodera, Schutte, & Noe, 2011b; Malmstrom et al., 2014; Da, Sheong,
Silva, & Huang, 2014). see great opportunity AI researchers, particularly
expertise machine learning, coordinate efforts computational biophysicists. efforts
undoubtedly lead richer powerful computational treatments biomolecular dynamics.
5.6 Cross-Fertilization Ideas
survey shows, work modeling biomolecular structure dynamics highly interdisciplinary, great progress achieved ideas different communities combined
integrated computational treatments. rich set scientific questions formulated understand role biomolecular structure dynamics human biology health.
questions often result exceptionally challenging computational problems necessitate
sophisticated algorithmic treatments. Treatments add current knowledge biomolecular
systems chemistry, physics, biophysics likely advance modeling capabilities make important, general contributions AI research.
555

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Acknowledgements
Funding work provided part National Science Foundation. work A. Shehu
supported NSF-CCF1421001, NSF-ACI1440581, NSF-IIS1144106. work E. Plaku
supported NSF-ACI1440581, NSF-IIS1449505, NSF-IIS1548406.

References
Abayagan, R., Totrov, M., & Kuznetsov, D. (1994). ICM - new method protein modeling
design: applications docking structure prediction distorted native conformation. J Comput Chem, 15(5), 488506.
Aden, J., & Wolf-Watz, M. (2007). NMR identification transient complexes critical adenylate
kinase catalysis. J Amer Chem Soc, 129(45), 14003 14012.
Al-Bluwi, I., Simeon, T., & Cortes, J. (2012). Motion planning algorithms molecular simulations: survey. Comput Sci Rev, 6(4), 125143.
Al-Bluwi, I., Vaisset, M., Simeon, T., & Cortes, J. (2013). Modeling protein conformational transitions combination coarse-grained normal mode analysis robotics-inspired methods. BMC Struct Biol, 13(S2), Suppl 1.
Amato, N. M., Bayazit, B., Dale, L., Jones, C., & Vallejo, D. (1998). OBPRM: obstacle-based
PRM 3D workspaces. Workshop Algorithm Found Robot, Vol. 86 Springer Tracts
Advanced Robotics, pp. 156168. Springer.
Amato, N. M., Dill, K. A., & Song, G. (2003). Using motion planning map protein folding
landscapes analyze folding kinetics known native structures. J Comput Biol, 10(3-4),
239255.
Anfinsen, C. B. (1973). Principles govern folding protein chains. Science, 181(4096),
223230.
Apaydin, M. S., Brutlag, D. L., Guestrin, C., Hsu, D., & Latombe, J.-C. (2003). Stochastic roadmap
simulation: efficient representation algorithm analyzing molecular motion. J Comput Biol, 10(3-4), 257281.
Apaydin, M. S., Brutlag, D. L., Hsu, D., & Latombe, J.-C. (2002). Stochastic conformational
roadmaps computing ensemble properties molecular motion. Workshop Algorithm
Found Robot, pp. 131147, Nice, France. IEEE.
Apaydin, M. S., Singh, A. P., Brutlag, D. L., & Latombe, J.-C. (2001). Capturing molecular energy
landscapes probabilistic conformational roadmaps. Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA),
Vol. 1, pp. 932939, Seoul, Korea. IEEE.
Atilgan, A., Durell, S., Jernigan, R., Demirel, M., Keskin, O., & Bahar, I. (2001). Anisotropy
fluctuation dynamics proteins elastic network model. Biophys J, 80(1), 505515.
Bahar, R., & Rader, A. J. (2005). Coarse-grained normal mode analysis structural biology. Curr
Opinion Struct Biol, 204(5), 17.
Baldwin, R. L. (1995). nature protein folding pathways: classical versus new view. J
Biomol NMR, 5(2), 103109.
556

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Barbe, S., Cortes, J., Simeon, T., Monsan, P., Remaud-Simeon, M., & Andre, I. (2011). mixed
molecular modeling-robotics approach investigate lipase large molecular motions. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 79(8), 25172529.
Baron, R. (2013). Fast sampling A-to-B protein global conformational transitions: Galileo
Galilei Monte Carlo anisotropic network modeling. Biophys J, 105(7), 15451546.
Batcho, P., Case, D. A., & Schlick, T. (2001). Optimized particle-mesh ewald/multiple-time step
integration molecular dynamics simulations. J Chem Phys, 115(9), 40034018.
Bekris, K. E., & Kavraki, L. E. (2007). Greedy safe replanning kinodynamic constraints.
Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 704710, Rome, Italy. IEEE.
Berman, H. M., Henrick, K., & Nakamura, H. (2003). Announcing worldwide Protein Data
Bank. Nat Struct Biol, 10(12), 980980.
Boehr, D. D., & Wright, P. E. (2008). proteins interact?. Science, 320(5882), 14291430.
Bradley, P., Misura, K. M., & Baker, D. (2005). Toward high-resolution de novo structure prediction
small proteins. Science, 309(5742), 18681871.
Brooks, B. R., Bruccoleri, R. E., Olafson, B. D., States, D. J., Swaminathan, S., & Karplus, M.
(1983). CHARMM: program macromolecular energy, minimization, dynamics calculations. J Comput Chem, 4(2), 187217.
Bryngelson, J. D., Onuchic, J. N., Socci, N. D., & Wolynes, P. G. (1995). Funnels, pathways,
energy landscape protein folding: synthesis. Proteins: Struct Funct Genet, 21(3),
167195.
Bryngelson, J. D., & Wolynes, P. G. (1987). Spin glasses statistical mechanics protein
folding. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 84(21), 75247528.
Burgess, A. W., & Scheraga, H. A. (1975). Assessment problems associated prediction
three-dimensional structure protein amino-acid sequence. Proc Natl Acad
Sci USA, 72(4), 12211225.
Burns, B., & Brock, O. (2007). Single-query motion planning utility-guided random trees.
Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 33073312, Rome, Italy. IEEE.
Case, D. A., Darden, T. A., Cheatham, T. E. I., Simmerling, C. L., Wang, J., Duke, R. E., Luo, R.,
Merz, K. M., Pearlman, D. A., Crowley, M., Walker, R. C., Zhang, W., Wang, B., Hayik, S.,
Roitberg, A., Seabra, G., Wong, K. F., Paesani, F., Wu, X., Brozell, S., Tsui, V., Gohlke, H.,
Yang, L., Tan, C., Mongan, J., et al. (2014). Amber 14. http://ambermd.org/.
Chiang, T. H., Apaydin, M., Brutlag, D., Hsu, D., & Latombe, J. (2006). Predicting experimental
quantities protein folding kinetics using stochastic roadmap simulation. Res Comput
Mol Biol, Vol. 3909 Lecture Notes Computer Science, pp. 410424. Springers.
Chiang, T. H., Apaydin, M. S., Brutlag, D. L., Hsu, D., & Latombe, J.-C. (2007). Using stochastic
roadmap simulation predict experimental quantities protein folding kinetics: folding
rates phi-values. J Comput Biol, 14(5), 578593.
Chiang, T. H., Hsu, D., & C., L. J. (2010). Markov dynamic models long-timescale protein
motion. Bioinformatics, 26(12), 269277.
557

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Chirikjian, G. S. (1993). General methods computing hyper-redundant manipulator inverse
kinematics. Intl Conf Intell Robot Sys (IROS), Vol. 2, pp. 10671073, Yokohama, Japan.
IEEE.
Chodera, J. D., & Noe, F. (2014). Markov state models biomolecular conformational dynamics.
Curr Opinion Struct Biol, 25, 135144.
Chodera, J. D., Singhal, N., Pande, V. S., Dill, K. A., & Swope, W. C. (2007). Automatic discovery
metastable states construction markov models macromolecular conformational
dynamics. J Chem Phys, 126(15), 155101.
Choset, H., & et al. (2005). Principles Robot Motion: Theory, Algorithms, Implementations
(1st edition). MIT Press, Cambridge, MA.
Ciu, Q., & Bahar, I. (2005). Normal Mode Analysis: Theory Applications Biological
Chemical Systems (1st edition). CRC Press.
Clausen, R., Ma, B., Nussinov, R., & Shehu, A. (2015). Mapping conformation space wildtype
mutant H-Ras memetic, cellular, multiscale evolutionary algorithm. PLoS
Comput Biol, 11(9), e1004470.
Clausen, R., & Shehu, A. (2015). data-driven evolutionary algorithm mapping multi-basin
protein energy landscapes. J Comp Biol, 22(9), 844860.
Clementi, C. (2008). Coarse-grained models protein folding: Toy-models predictive tools?.
Curr Opinion Struct Biol, 18(1), 1015.
Coifman, R. R., Lafon, S., Lee, A. B., Maggioni, M., Nadler, B., Warner, F., & Zucker, S. W. (2005).
Geometric diffusions tool harmonic analysis structure definition data: Diffusion
maps. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 102(21), 74267431.
Cooper, A. (1984). Protein fluctuations thermodynamic uncertainty principle. Prog Biophys
Mol Biol, 44(3), 181214.
Cortes, J., Jaillet, L., & Simeon, T. (2007). Molecular disassembly RRT-like algorithms.
Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 33013306, Roma, Italy.
Cortes, J., Le, D. T., Lehl, R., & Simeon, T. (2010). Simulating ligand-induced conformational
changes proteins using mechanical disassembly method. Phys Chem Chem Phys, 12(29),
82688276.
Cortes, J., Simeon, T.AND Remauld-Simeon, M., & Tran, V. (2004). Geometric algorithms
conformational analysis long protein loops. J Comput Chem, 25(7), 956967.
Cortes, J., Simeon, T.AND de Angulo, R., Guieysse, D., Remaud-Simeon, M., & Tran, V. (2005).
path planning approach computing large-amplitude motions flexible molecules. Bioinformatics, 21(S1), 116125.
Craig, J. (1989). Introduction robotics: mechanics control (2nd edition). Addison-Wesley,
Boston, MA.
Da, L. T., Sheong, F. K., Silva, D. A., & Huang, X. (2014). Application Markov state models
simulate long timescale dynamics biological macromolecules. Adv Exp Med Biol, 805,
2966.
558

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Dalibard, S., & Laumond, J.-P. (2009). Control probabilistic diffusion motion planning.
Workshop Algorithm Found Robot, Vol. 57 Springer Tracts Advanced Robotics, pp. 467
481. Springer.
Das, A., Gur, M., Cheng, M. H., Jo, S., Bahar, I., & Roux, B. (2014). Exploring conformational transitions biomolecular systems using simple two-state anisotropic network
model. PLoS Comput Biol, 10(4), e1003521.
Das, P., Matysiak, S., & Clementi, C. (2005). Balancing energy entropy: minimalist model
characterization protein folding landscapes. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 102(29),
1014110146.
Das, P., Moll, M., Stamati, H., Kavraki, L. E., & Clementi, C. (2006). Low-dimensional free energy
landscapes protein folding reactions nonlinear dimensionality reduction. Proc Natl
Acad Sci USA, 103(26), 98859890.
Delarue, M., & Sanejouand, Y. H. (2002). Simplified normal mode analysis conformational
transitions DNA-dependent polymerases: elastic network model. J Mol Biol, 320(5),
10111024.
Deng, N.-J., Dai, W., & Levy, R. M. (2013). kinetics within unfolded state affects protein
folding: analysis based markov state models ultra-long md trajectory. J Phys
Chem B, 117(42), 1278712799.
Denny, J., & Amato, N. M. (2013). Toggle PRM: coordinated mapping C-free C-obstacle
arbitrary dimension. Workshop Algorithm Found Robot, Vol. 86 Springer Tracts
Advanced Robotics, pp. 297312. Springer.
Devaurs, D., Molloy, K., Vaisset, M., Shehu, A., Cortes, J., & Simeon, T. (2015). Characterizing
energy landscapes peptides using combination stochastic algorithms. IEEE Trans
NanoBioScience, 14(5), 545552.
Diekmann, S., & Hoischen, C. (2014). Biomolecular dynamics binding studies living
cell. Physics Life Reviews, 11(1), 130.
Dill, K. A., & Chan, H. S. (1997). Levinthal pathways funnels. Nat Struct Biol, 4(1),
1019.
Dryga, A., Chakrabarty, S., Vicatos, S., & Warshel, A. (2011). Realistic simulation activation
voltage-gated ion channels. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 109(9), 33353340.
Dubrow, A. (2015). got done one year NSFs Stampede supercomputer. Comput Sci Eng,
17(2), 8388.
Ekenna, C., Thomas, S., & Amato, N. (2016). Adaptive local learning sampling based motion
planning protein folding. BMC Syst Biol, 10(Suppl 2).
Engh, R. A., & Huber, R. (1991). Accurate bond angle parameters X-ray protein structure
refinement. Acta Crystallogr, A47, 392400.
Enosh, A., Raveh, B., Furman-Schueler, O., Halperin, D., & Ben-Tal, N. (2008). Generation, comparison, merging pathways protein conformations: gating K-channels. Biophys J, 95(8), 38503860.
559

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Fattebert, J.-L., Richards, D. F., & Glosli, J. N. (2012). Dynamic load balancing algorithm
molecular dynamics based voronoi cells domain decompositions. Comput Phys Communic, 183(12), 26082615.
Fenwick, R. B., van den Bedem, H., Fraser, J. S., & Wright, P. E. (2014). Integrated description
protein dynamics room-temperature X-ray crystallography NMR. Proc Natl Acad
Sci USA, 111(4), E445E454.
Fernandez-Medarde, A., & Santos, E. (2011). Ras cancer developmental diseases. Genes
Cancer, 2(3), 344358.
Fersht, A. (2013). Profile martin karplus, michael levitt, arieh warshel, 2013 nobel laureates
chemistry. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 110(49), 1965619657.
Fersht, A. R. (1999). Structure Mechanism Protein Science. Guide Enzyme Catalysis
Protein Folding (3 edition). W. H. Freeman Co., New York, NY.
Feynman, R. P., Leighton, R. B., & Sands, M. (1963). Feynman Lectures Physics. AddisonWesley, Reading, MA.
Fischer, S., & Karplus, M. (1992). Conjugate peak refinement: algorithm finding reaction
paths accurate transition states systems many degrees freedom. Chem Phys
Lett, 194(3), 252261.
Fox, N., & Streinu, I. (2013). Towards accurate modeling noncovalent interactions protein
rigidity analysis. BMC Bioinf, 14(Suppl 18), S3.
Gall, A., Ilioaia, C., Kruger, T. P., Novoderezhkin, V. I., Robert, B., & van Grondelle, R. (2015).
Conformational switching light-harvesting protein followed single-molecule spectroscopy. Biophys J, 108(11), 27132720.
Gibbs, J. B., Schaber, M. D., Allard, W. J., Sigal, I. S., & Scolnick, E. M. (1988). Purification Ras
GTPase activating protein bovine brain. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 85(14), 50265030.
Gipson, B., Hsu, D., Kavraki, L. E., & Latombe, J.-C. (2012). Computational models protein
kinematics dynamics: Beyond simulation. Annu Rev Anal Chem, 5, 273291.
Gipson, B., Moll, M., & Kavraki, L. E. (2013). SIMS: hybrid method rapid conformational
analysis. PLoS One, 8(7), e68826.
Gorfe, A. A., Grant, B. J., & McCammon, J. A. (2008). Mapping nucleotide isoformdependent structural dynamical features Ras proteins. Structure, 16(6), 885896.
Gotz, A. W., Williamson, M. J., Xu, D., Poole, D., Le Grand, S., & Walker, R. C. (2012). Routine
microsecond molecular dynamics simulations amber GPUs. 1. Generalized Born. J
Chem Theory Comput, 8(5), 15421555.
Grant, B. J., Gorfe, A. A., & McCammon, J. A. (2009). Ras conformational switching: Simulating
nucleotide-dependent conformational transitions accelerated molecular dynamics. PLoS
Comput Biol, 5(3), e1000325.
Greenleaf, W. J., Woodside, M. T., & Block, S. M. (2007). High-resolution, single-molecule measurements biomolecular motion. Annu Rev Biophys Biomol Struct, 36, 171190.
Gremer, L., Gilsbach, B., Ahmadian, M. R., & Wittinghofer, A. (2008). Fluoride complexes
oncogenic Ras mutants study Ras-RasGap interaction. Biol Chem, 389(9), 11631171.
560

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Gsponer, J., Christodoulou, J., Cavalli, A., Bui, J. M., Richter, B., Dobson, C. M., & Vendruscolo, M.
(2008). coupled equilibrium shift mechanism calmodulin-mediated signal transduction.
Structure, 16(5), 736746.
Han, K. F., & Baker, D. (1996). Global properties mapping local amino acid sequence
local structure proteins. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 93(12), 58145818.
Han, L., & Amato, N. M. (2001). kinematics-based probabilistic roadmap method closed chain
systems. Donald, B. R., Lynch, K. M., & Rus, D. (Eds.), Algorithmic Computational
Robotics: New Directions, pp. 233246. AK Peters, MA.
Harvey, M. J., Giupponi, G., & de Fabritiis, G. (2009). ACEMD: Accelerating biomolecular dynamics microsecond timescale. J Comput Theor Chem, 5(6), 16321639.
Haspel, N., Moll, M., Baker, M. L., Chiu, W., & E., K. L. (2010). Tracing conformational changes
proteins. BMC Struct Biol, 10(Suppl1), S1.
Haspel, N., Tsai, C., Wolfson, H., & Nussinov, R. (2003). Reducing computational complexity
protein folding via fragment folding assembly. Protein Sci, 12(6), 11771187.
Hastings, W. K. (1970). Monte Carlo sampling methods using Markov chains applications.
Biometrika, 57(1), 97109.
Hermans, J., Berendsen, H. J. C., van Gunsteren, W. F., & Postma, J. P. M. (1984). consistent
empirical potential water-protein interactions. Biopolymers, 23(8), 15131518.
Hoang, T. H., Trovato, A., Seno, F., Banavar, J. R., & Maritan, A. (2007). Geometry symmetry
presculpt free-energy landscape proteins. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 101(21), 7960
7964.
Hoard, B., Jacobson, B., Manavi, K., & Tapia, L. (2016). Extending rule-based methods model
molecular geometry 3d model resolution. BMC Syst Biol, 10(Suppl 2), 48.
Hoelder, S., Clarke, P. A., & Workman, P. (2012). Discovery small molecule cancer drugs:
Successes, challenges opportunities. Mol Oncol, 6(2), 522524.
Hohlbein, J., Craggs, T. D., & Cordes, T. (2014). Alternating-laser excitation: single-molecule
FRET beyond. Chem Soc Rev, 43(4), 11561171.
Hori, N., Chikenji, G., & Takada, S. (2009). Folding energy landscape network dynamics
small globular proteins. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 106(1), 7378.
Hornak, V., Abel, R., Okur, A., Strockbine, B., Roitberg, A., & Simmerling, C. (2006). Comparison
multiple amber force fields development improved protein backbone parameters.
Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 65(3), 712725.
Hsu, D., Kindel, R., Latombe, J.-C., & Rock, S. (2002). Randomized kinodynamic motion planning
moving obstacles. Intl J Robot Res, 21(3), 233255.
Hsu, D., Sanchez-Ante, G., & Sun, Z. (2005). Hybrid PRM sampling cost-sensitive adaptive
strategy. Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 38853891, Barcelona, Spain.
Humphrey, W., Dalke, A., & Schulten, K. (1996). VMD - Visual Molecular Dynamics. J Mol Graph
Model, 14(1), 3338. http://www.ks.uiuc.edu/Research/vmd/.
Jaillet, L., Corcho, F. J., Perez, J.-J., & Cortes, J. (2011). Randomized tree construction algorithm
explore energy landscapes. J Comput Chem, 32(16), 34643474.
561

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Jaillet, L., Cortes, J., & Simeon, T. (2008). Transition-based RRT path planning continuous
cost spaces. Intl Conf Intell Robot Sys (IROS), pp. 2226, Stanford, CA. IEEE/RSJ.
Jaillet, L., Yershova, A., LaValle, S. M., & Simeon, T. (2005). Adaptive tuning sampling
domain dynamic-domain RRTs. Intl Conf Intell Robot Sys (IROS), pp. 40864091.
IEEE/RSJ.
Jayachandran, G., Vishal, V., & Pande, V. S. (2006). Using massively parallel simulation Markovian models study protein folding: examining dynamics villin headpiece. J Chem
Phys, 124(16), 164902164914.
Jenzler-Wildman, K., & Kern, D. (2007). Dynamic personalities proteins. Nature, 450(7172),
964972.
Jorgensen, W. L., Maxwell, D. S., & Tirado-Reves, J. (1988). Development testing OPLS
all-atom force field conformational energetics properties organic liquids. J Amer
Chem Soc, 118(45), 1122511236.
Kalisiak, M., & van de Panne, M. (2006). RRT-blossom: RRT local flood-fill behavior.
Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 12371242, Orlando, FL. IEEE.
Kamerlin, S. C., Haranczyk, M., & Warshel, A. (2009). Progresses ab initio QM/MM free energy
simulations electrostatic energies proteins: Accelerated QM/MM studies pka, redox
reactions solvation free energies. J Phys Chem B, 113(5), 12531272.
Karam, P., Powdrill, M. H., Liu, H. W., Vasquez, C., Mah, W., Bernatchez, J., Gotte, M., & Cosa,
G. (2014). Dynamics hepatitis C virus (HCV) RNA-dependent RNA polymerase NS5B
complex RNA. J Biol Chem, 289(20), 1439914411.
Karaman, S., & Frazzoli, E. (2011). Sampling-based algorithms optimal motion planning. Intl
J Robot Res, 30(7), 846894.
Karnoub, A. E., & Weinberg, R. A. (2008). Ras oncogenes: split personalities. Nat Rev Mol Cell
Biol, 9(7), 517531.
Kavraki, L. E., Svestka, P., Latombe, J. C., & Overmars, M. H. (1996). Probabilistic roadmaps
path planning high-dimensional configuration spaces. IEEE Trans Robot Automat, 12(4),
566580.
Kay, L. E. (1998). Protein dynamics NMR. Nat Struct Biol, 5(2-3), 513517.
Kay, L. E. (2005). NMR studies protein structure dynamics. J Magn Reson, 173(2), 193207.
Kendrew, J. C., Bodo, G., Dintzis, H. M., Parrish, R. G., Wyckoff, H., & Phillips, D. C. (1958).
three-dimensional model myoglobin molecule obtained X-ray analysis. Nature,
181(4610), 662666.
Kendrew, J. C., Dickerson, R. E., Strandberg, B. E., Hart, R. G., Davies, D. R., Phillips, D. C., &
Shore, V. C. (1960). Structure myoglobin: three-dimensional Fourier synthesis 2A
resolution. Nature, 185(4711), 422427.
Khaliullin, R. Z., VandeVondele, J., & Hutter, J. (2013). Efficient linear-scaling density functional
theory molecular systems. J Chem Theory Comput, 9(10), 44214427.
Kiesel, S., Burns, E., & Ruml, W. (2012). Abstraction-guided sampling motion planning.
Symp Combinat Search (SOCS), pp. 162163, Niagara Falls, Canada.
562

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Kim, K. M., Jernigan, R. L., & Chirikjian, G. S. (2002a). Efficient generation feasible pathways
protein conformational transitions. Biophys J, 83(3), 16201630.
Kim, M. K., Chirikjian, G. S., & Jernigan, R. L. (2002b). Elastic models conformational transitions macromolecules. J Mol Graph Model, 21(2), 151160.
Kirillova, S., Cortes, J., Stefaniu, A., & Simeon, T. (2008). NMA-guided path planning approach
computing large-amplitude conformational changes proteins. Proteins: Struct Funct
Bioinf, 70(1), 131143.
Kolodny, R., Guibas, L., Levitt, M., & Koehl, P. (2005). Inverse kinematics biology: protein
loop closure problem. Intl J Robot Res, 24(2-3), 151163.
Ladd, A. M., & Kavraki, L. E. (2004). Fast tree-based exploration state space robots dynamics. Workshop Algorithm Found Robot, pp. 297312. Springer, Utrecht/Zeist, Netherlands.
Ladd, A. M., & Kavraki, L. E. (2005). Motion planning presence drift, underactuation
discrete system changes. Robot: Sci Sys, pp. 233241, Boston, MA.
LaValle, S. M., & Kuffner, J. J. (2001). Randomized kinodynamic planning. Intl J Robot Res, 20(5),
378400.
Leaver-Fay, A., Tyka, M., Lewis, S. M., Lange, O. F., Thompson, J., Jacak, R., Kaufman, K., Renfrew, P. D., Smith, C. A., Sheffler, W., Davis, I. W., Cooper, S., Treuille, A., Mandell, D. J.,
Richter, F., Ban, Y. E., Fleishman, S. J., Corn, J. E., Kim, D. E., Lyskov, S., Berrondo, M.,
Mentzer, S., Popovi, Z., & et. al. (2011). ROSETTA3: object-oriented software suite
simulation design macromolecules. Methods Enzymol, 487, 545574.
Lee, A., Streinu, I., & Brock, O. (2005). methodology efficiently sampling conformation
space molecular structures. J Phys Biol, 2(4), 108S115.
Lee, H. M., M., K. S., Kim, H. M., & Suh, Y. D. (2013). Single-molecule surface-enhanced Raman
spectroscopy: perspective current status. Phys Chem Chem Phys, 15, 52765287.
Lee, J., Kwon, O., Zhang, L., & Yoon, S.-E. (2014). selective retraction-based RRT planner
various environments. IEEE Trans Robotics, 30(4), 10021011.
Levitt, M., & Lifson, S. (1969). Refinement protein conformations using macromolecular
energy minimization procedure. J Mol Biol, 46(2), 269279.
Levitt, M., & Warshel, A. (1975). Computer simulation protein folding. Nature, 253(5494),
9496.
Levy, Y., Jortner, J., & Becker, O. M. (2001). Solvent effects energy landscapes folding
kinetics polyalanine. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 98(5), 21882193.
Li, D., Yang, H., Han, L., & Huo, S. (2008). Predicting folding pathway engrailed homeodomain probabilistic roadmap enhanced reaction-path algorithm. Biophys J, 94(5),
16221629.
Lifson, S., & Warshel, A. (1968). consistent force field calculation conformations, vibrational spectra enthalpies cycloalkanes n-alkane molecules. J Phys Chem, 49,
51165129.
563

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Lin, T., & Song, G. (2011). Efficient mapping ligand migration channel networks dynamic
proteins. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 79(8), 24752490.
Lindorff-Larsen, K., Piana, S., Dror, R. O., & Shaw, D. E. (2011). fast-folding proteins fold.
Science, 334(6055), 517520.
Lois, G., Blawzdziewicz, J., & OHern, C. S. (2010). Protein folding rugged energy landscapes:
Conformational diffusion fractal networks. Phys Rev E Stat Nonlin Soft Matter Phys, 81(5
Pt 1), 051907.
Lotan, I., van den Bedem, H., Deacon, A. M., & Latombe, J.-C. (2004). Computing protein structures electron density maps: mising loop problem. Erdman, M., Hsu, D., Overmars, M., & van der Stappen, F. (Eds.), Algorithmic Foundations Robotics VI, pp. 153168.
Springer STAR Series.
Ma, B., Kumar, S., Tsai, C., & Nussinov, R. (1999). Folding funnels binding mechanisms.
Protein Eng, 12(9), 713720.
Ma, J., & Karplus, M. (1997). Molecular switch signal transduction: reaction paths conformational changes ras p21. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 94(22), 1190511910.
Maisuradze, G. G., Liwo, A., & Scheraga, H. A. (2009). Principal component analysis protein
folding dynamics. J Mol Biol, 385(1), 312329.
Malmstrom, R. D., Lee, C. T., Van Wart, A. T., & Amaro, R. E. (2014). Application moleculardynamics based Markov state models functional proteins. J Chem Theory Comput, 10(7),
26482657.
Manocha, D., & Canny, J. (1994). Efficient inverse kinematics general 6r manipulator. IEEE
Trans Robot Autom, 10(5), 648657.
Manocha, D., & Zhu, Y. (1994). Kinematic manipulation molecular chains subject rigid constraints. Altman, R. B., Brutlag, D. L., Karp, P. D., Lathrop, R. H., & Searls, D. B. (Eds.),
Intl Conf Intell Sys Mol Biol (ISMB), Vol. 2, pp. 285293, Stanford, CA. AAAI.
Manocha, D., Zhu, Y., & Wright, W. (1995). Conformational analysis molecular chains using
nano-kinematics. Comput. Appl. Biosci., 11(1), 7186.
Maragakis, P., & Karplus, M. (2005). Large amplitude conformational change proteins explored
plastic network model: adenylate kinase. J Mol Biol, 352(4), 807822.
Matysiak, S., & Clementi, C. (2004). Optimal combination theory experiment characterization protein folding landscape S6: far minimalist model go?. J
Mol Biol, 343(8), 235248.
Matysiak, S., & Clementi, C. (2006). Minimalist protein model diagnostic tool misfolding
aggregation. J Mol Biol, 363(1), 297308.
Maximova, T., Moffatt, R., Ma, B., Nussinov, R., & Shehu, A. (2016). Principles overview
sampling methods modeling macromolecular structure dynamics. PLoS Comput Biol,
12(4), e1004619.
Maximova, T., Plaku, E., & Shehu, A. (2015). Computing transition paths multiple-basin proteins
probabilistic roadmap algorithm guided structure data. Intl Conf Bioinf
Biomed (BIBM), pp. 3542, Washington, D.C. IEEE.
564

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

McCammon, J. A., Gelin, B. R., & Karplus, M. (1977). Dynamics folded proteins. Nature,
267(5612), 585590.
McLachlan, A. D. (1972). mathematical procedure superimposing atomic coordinates
proteins. Acta Crystallogr A, 26(6), 656657.
McMahon, T., Thomas, S., & Amato, N. M. (2015). Reachable volume RRT. Intl Conf Robot
Autom (ICRA), pp. 29772984, Seattle, WA. IEEE.
Metropolis, N., Rosenbluth, A. W., Rosenbluth, M. N., Teller, A. H., & Teller, E. (1953). Equation
state calculations fast computing machines. J Chem Phys, 21(6), 10871092.
Miao, Y., Sinko, W., Pierce, L., Bucher, D., Walker, R. C., & McCammon, J. A. (2014). Improved
reweighting accelerated molecular dynamics simulations free energy calculation. J
Chem Theory Comput, 10(7), 26772689.
Michalet, X., Weiss, S., & Jager, M. (2006). Single-molecule fluorescence studies protein folding
conformational dynamics. Chem Rev, 106(5), 17851813.
Moerner, W. E., & Fromm, D. P. (2003). Methods single-molecule fluorescence spectroscopy.
Rev Scientific Instruments, 74(8), 35973619.
Moffat, K. (2003). frontiers time-resolved macromolecular crystallography: movies
chirped X-ray pulses. Faraday Discuss, 122(79-88), 6577.
Moll, M., Schwartz, D., & Kavraki, L. E. (2008). Roadmap methods protein folding. Zaki,
M., & Bystroff, C. (Eds.), Protein Structure Prediction, Vol. 413 Methods Mol Biol, pp.
219239. Springer.
Molloy, K., Clausen, R., & Shehu, A. (2016). stochastic roadmap method model protein
structural transitions. Robotica, 34(8), 17051733.
Molloy, K., Saleh, S., & Shehu, A. (2013). Probabilistic search energy guidance biased
decoy sampling ab-initio protein structure prediction. IEEE/ACM Trans Bioinf Comp
Biol, 10(5), 11621175.
Molloy, K., & Shehu, A. (2013). Elucidating ensemble functionally-relevant transitions
protein systems robotics-inspired method. BMC Struct Biol, 13(Suppl 1), S8.
Molloy, K., & Shehu, A. (2015). Interleaving global local search protein motion computation. Harrison, R., Li, Y., & Mandoiu, I. (Eds.), LNCS: Bioinformatics Research
Applications, Vol. 9096, pp. 175186, Norfolk, VA. Springer International Publishing.
Molloy, K., & Shehu, A. (2016). general, adaptive, roadmap-based algorithm protein motion
computation. IEEE Trans. NanoBioSci., 2(15), 158165.
Mukherjee, S., & Warshel, A. (2011). Electrostatic origin mechanochemical rotary mechanism catalytic dwell F1-ATPase. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 108(51), 2055020555.
Mukherjee, S., & Warshel, A. (2012). Realistic simulations coupling protomotive
force mechanical rotation F0-ATPase. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 109(3), 14876
14881.
Mukherjee, S., & Warshel, A. (2013). Electrostatic origin unidirectionality walking myosin
v motors. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 110(43), 1732617331.
565

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Na, H., & Song, G. (2015). Quantitative delineation breathing motions open ligand migration
channels myoglobin mutants. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 83(4), 757770.
Neudecker, P., Robustelli, P., Cavalli, A., Walsh, P., Lundstrm, P., Zarrine-Afsar, A., Sharpe, S.,
Vendruscolo, M., & Kay, L. E. (2012). Structure intermediate state protein folding
aggregation. Science, 336(6079), 362366.
Nevo, R., Brumfeld, V., Kapon, R., Hinterdorfer, P., & Reich, Z. (2005). Direct measurement
protein energy landscape roughness. EMBO Rep, 6(5), 482486.
Nielsen, C. L., & Kavraki, L. E. (2000). two level fuzzy PRM manipulation planning. Intl
Conf Intell Robot Sys (IROS), Vol. 3, pp. 17161721, Takamatsu, Japan. IEEE/RSJ.
Noe, F., Doose, S., Daidone, I., Lollmann, M., Sauer, M., Chodera, J. D., & Smith, J. C. (2011).
Dynamical fingerprints probing individual relaxation processes biomolecular dynamics
simulations kinetic experiments. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 108(12), 48224827.
Noe, F., & Fischer, S. (2008). Transition networks modeling kinetics conformational
change macromolecules. Curr Opinion Struct Biol, 18(2), 154162.
Olson, B., Hashmi, I., Molloy, K., & Shehu, A. (2012). Basin hopping general versatile
optimization framework characterization biological macromolecules. Advances
AI J, 2012(674832).
Olson, B., & Shehu, A. (2012). Evolutionary-inspired probabilistic search enhancing sampling
local minima protein energy surface. Proteome Sci, 10(Suppl 1), S5.
Olson, B. S., Molloy, K., Hendi, S.-F., & Shehu, A. (2012). Guiding search protein conformational space structural profiles. J Bioinf & Comput Biol, 10(3), 1242005.
Onuchic, J. N., Luthey-Schulten, Z., & Wolynes, P. G. (1997). Theory protein folding: energy
landscape perspective. Annu Rev Phys Chem, 48, 545600.
Onuchic, J. N., & Wolynes, P. G. (2004). Theory protein folding. Curr Opinion Struct Biol, 14,
7075.
Ovchinnikov, V., & Karplus, M. (2012). Analysis elimination bias targeted molecular
dynamics simulations conformational transitions: Application calmodulin. J Phys Chem
B, 116(29), 85848603.
Ozenne, V., Schneider, R., Yao, M., Huang, J. R., Salmon, L., Zweckstetter, M., Jensen, M. R., &
Blackledge, M. (2012). Mapping potential energy landscape intrinsically disordered
proteins amino acid resolution. J Amer Chem Soc, 134(36), 1513815148.
Ozkan, S. B., Dill, K. A., & Bahar, I. (2002). Fast-folding protein kinetics, hidden intermediates,
sequential stabilization model. Protein Sci, 11(8), 19581970.
Palmieri, L., & Arras, K. O. (2015). Distance metric learning RRT-based motion planning
constant-time inference. Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 637643, Seattle, WA. IEEE.
Pande, V. S., Beachamp, K., & Bowman, G. R. (2010). Everything wanted know
Markov state models afraid ask. Nat Methods, 52(1), 99105.
Papoian, G. A., Ulander, J., Eastwood, M. P., Luthey-Schulten, Z., & Wolynes, P. G. (2004). Water
protein structure prediction. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 101(10), 33523357.
566

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Perez-Hernandez, G., Paul, F., Giorgino, T., De Fabritiis, G., & Noe, F. (2013). Identification slow
molecular order parameters markov model construction. J Chem Phys, 139(1), 015102.
Perilla, J. R., Goh, B. C., Cassidy, C. K., Liu, B., Bernardi, R. C., Rudack, T., Yu, H., Wu, Z., &
Schulten, K. (2015). Molecular dynamics simulations large macromolecular complexes.
Curr Opin Struct Biol, 31, 6474.
Phillips, D. C. (1967). hen egg-white lysozyme molecule. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 57(3),
483495.
Phillips, J. C., Braun, R., Wang, W., Gumbart, J., Tajkhorshid, E., Villa, E., Chipot, C., Skeel, R. D.,
Kale, L., & Schulten, K. (2005). Scalable molecular dynamics NAMD. J Comput Chem,
26(16), 17811802.
Piana, S., Lindorff-Larsen, K., Dirks, R. M., Salmon, J. K., Dror, R. O., & Shaw, D. E. (2012a).
Evaluating effects cutoffs treatment long-range electrostatics protein folding
simulations. PLoS ONE, 7(6), e39918.
Piana, S., Lindorff-Larsen, K., & Shaw, D. E. (2012b). Protein folding kinetics thermodynamics
atomistic simulation. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 109(44), 1784517850.
Plaku, E. (2015). Region-guided sampling-based tree search motion planning dynamics. IEEE Transactions Robotics, 31(3), 723735.
Plaku, E., Stamati, H., Clementi, C., & Kavraki, L. E. (2007). Fast reliable analysis molecular motions using proximity relations dimensionality reduction. Proteins: Struct Funct
Bioinf, 67(4), 897907.
Plaku, E., Kavraki, L. E., & Vardi, M. Y. (2010). Motion planning dynamics synergistic
combination layers planning. IEEE Transactions Robotics, 26(3), 469482.
Ponder, J. W., & Case, D. A. (2003). Force fields protein simulations. Adv Protein Chem, 66,
2785.
Porta, J. M., & Jaillet, L. (2013). Exploring energy landscapes flexible molecular loops using
higher-dimensional continuation. J Comput Chem, 34(3), 234244.
Porta, J. M., Thomas, F., Corcho, F., Canto, J., & Perez, J. J. (2007). Complete maps molecularloop conformation spaces. J Comput Chem, 28(13), 21702189.
Prinz, J. H., Keller, B., & Noe, F. (2011a). Probing molecular kinetics Markov models:
metastable states, transition pathways spectroscopic observables. Phys Chem Chem Phys,
13(38), 1691216927.
Prinz, J. H., Wu, H., Sarich, M., Keller, B., Senne, M., Held, M., Chodera, J. D., Schutte, C., & Noe,
F. (2011b). Markov models molecular kinetics: generation validation. J Chem Phys,
134(17), 174105.
Proctor, A. J., Lipscomb, T. J., Zou, A., Anderson, J. A., & Cho, S. S. (2012). Performance analyses
parallel verlet neighbor list algorithm GPU-optimized MD simulations. ASE/IEEE
Intl Conf Biomed Comput (BioMedCom), pp. 1419, Alexandria, VA. IEEE.
Ramachandran, G. N., Ramakrishnan, C., & Sasisekharan, V. (1963). Stereochemistry polypeptide chain configurations. J Mol Biol, 7, 9599.
567

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Raveh, B., Enosh, A., Furman-Schueler, O., & Halperin, D. (2009). Rapid sampling molecular
motions prior information constraints,. PLoS Comput Biol, 5(2), e1000295.
Rodriguez, S., Thomas, S., Pearce, R., & Amato, N. (2006a). RESAMPL: Region-Sensitive
Adaptive Motion Planner. Workshop Algorithm Found Robot, Vol. 47 Springer Tracts
Advanced Robotics, pp. 285300. Springer, New York, NY.
Rodriguez, S., Tang, X., Lien, J.-M., & Amato, N. M. (2006b). obstacle-based rapidly-exploring
random tree. Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 895900, Orlando, FL. IEEE.
Rohrdanz, M. A., Zheng, W., Maggioni, M., & Clementi, C. (2011). Determination reaction
coordinates via locally scaled diffusion map. J Chem Phys, 134(12), 124116.
Rose, G. D., Fleming, P. J., Banavar, J. R., & Maritan, A. (2006). backbone-based theory
protein folding. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 103(45), 1662316633.
Roweis, S. T., & Saul, L. K. (2000). Nonlinear dimensionality reduction locally linear embedding. Science, 290(5500), 23232326.
Roy, R., Hohng, S., & Ha, T. (2008). practical guide single-molecule FRET. Nat Methods,
5(6), 507516.
Rychkova, A., Mukherjee, S., Bora, R. P., & Warshel, A. (2013). Simulating pulling stalled
elongated peptide ribosome translocon. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 110(25),
1019510200.
Sanchez, G., & Latombe, J.-C. (2002). delaying collision checking PRM planning: Application multi-robot coordination. Intl J Robot Res, 21(1), 526.
Sapin, E., Carr, D. B., De Jong, K. A., & Shehu, A. (2016). Computing energy landscape maps
structural excursions proteins. BMC Genomics, 17(Suppl 4), 456.
Schlau-Cohen, G. S., Wang, Q., Southall, J., Cogdell, R. J., & Moerner, W. E. (2013). Singlemolecule spectroscopy reveals photosynthetic LH2 complexes switch emissive
states. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 110(27), 1089910903.
Schotte, F., Lim, M., Jackson, T. A., Smirnov, A. V., Soman, J., Olson, J. S., Phillips, G. N., Wulff,
M., & Anfinrud, P. A. (2003). Watching protein functions 150-ps time-resolved
X-ray crystallography. Science, 300(5627), 19441947.
Schuyler, A. d., Jernigan, R. L., Wasba, P. K., Ramakrishnan, B., & Chirikjian, G. S. (2009). Iterative
cluster-NMA (icnma): tool generating conformational transitions proteins. Proteins:
Struct Funct Bioinf, 74(3), 760776.
Shatsky, M., Nussinov, R., & Wolfson, H. J. (2002). Flexible protein alignment hinge detection.
Proteins, 48(2), 242256.
Shaw, D. E., Maragakis, P., Lindorff-Larsen, K., Piana, S., Dror, R. O., Eastwood, M. P., Bank, J. A.,
Jumper, J. M., Salmon, J. K., Shan, Y., & Wriggers, W. (2010). Atomic-level characterization
structural dynamics proteins. Science, 330(6002), 341346.
Shehu, A. (2009). ab-initio tree-based exploration enhance sampling low-energy protein
conformations. Robot: Sci Sys, pp. 241248, Seattle, WA, USA.
Shehu, A. (2013). Probabilistic search optimization protein energy landscapes. Aluru, S.,
& Singh, A. (Eds.), Handbook Computational Molecular Biology. Chapman & Hall/CRC
Computer & Information Science Series.
568

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Shehu, A., Clementi, C., & Kavraki, L. E. (2006). Modeling protein conformational ensembles:
missing loops equilibrium fluctuations. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 65(1), 164
179.
Shehu, A., Clementi, C., & Kavraki, L. E. (2007). Sampling conformation space model equilibrium fluctuations proteins. Algorithmica, 48(4), 303327.
Shehu, A., & Kavraki, L. E. (2012). Modeling structures motions loops protein molecules.
Entropy J, 14(2), 252290.
Shehu, A., Kavraki, L. E., & Clementi, C. (2007). characterization protein native state
ensembles. Biophys J, 92(5), 15031511.
Shehu, A., Kavraki, L. E., & Clementi, C. (2008). Unfolding fold cyclic cysteine-rich peptides. Protein Sci, 17(3), 482493.
Shehu, A., Kavraki, L. E., & Clementi, C. (2009). Multiscale characterization protein conformational ensembles. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 76(4), 837851.
Shehu, A., & Olson, B. (2010). Guiding search native-like protein conformations
ab-initio tree-based exploration. Intl J Robot Res, 29(8), 110611227.
Shkolnik, A., Walter, M., & Tedrake, R. (2009). Reachability-guided sampling planning
differential constraints. Intl Conf Robot Autom (ICRA), pp. 28592865.
Shlens,
J.
(2003).

tutorial

principal
component
https://www.cs.princeton.edu/picasso/mats/PCA-Tutorial-Intuition jp.pdf.

analysis.

Shukla, D., Hernandez, C. X., Weber, J. K., & Pande, V. S. (2015). Markov state models provide
insights dynamic modulation protein function. Acc Chem Res, 48(2), 414422.
Singh, A. P., Latombe, J.-C., & Brutlag, D. L. (1999). motion planning approach flexible ligand
binding. Schneider, R., Bork, P., Brutlag, D. L., Glasgow, J. I., Mewes, H.-W., & Zimmer,
R. (Eds.), Intl Conf Intell Sys Mol Biol (ISMB), Vol. 7, pp. 252261, Heidelberg, Germany.
AAAI.
Singhal, N., & Pande, V. S. (2005). Error analysis efficient sampling markovian state models
molecular dynamics. J Chem Phys, 123(20), 204909120490913.
Singhal, N., Snow, C. D., & Pande, V. S. (2004). Using path sampling build better markovian
state models: Predicting folding rate mechanism tryptophan zipper beta hairpin.
J Chem Phys, 121(1), 415425.
Socher, E., & Imperiali, B. (2013). FRET-CAPTURE: sensitive method detection
dynamic protein interactions. Chem Biochem, 14(1), 5357.
Song, G., & Amato, N. M. (2000). motion-planning approach folding: paper craft
protein folding. Tech. rep. TR00-001, Department Computer Science, Texas & University.
Song, G., & Amato, N. M. (2004). motion planning approach folding: paper craft
protein folding. IEEE Trans Robot Autom, 20(1), 6071.
Song, J., & Zhuang, W. (2014). Simulating peptide folding kinetic related spectra based
Markov state model. Protein Conformational Dynamics, Vol. 805 Adv Exp Med Biol,
pp. 199220. Springer.
569

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Soto, C. (2008). Protein misfolding neurodegeneration. JAMA Neurology, 65(2), 184189.
Stadler, P. (2002). Fitness landscapes. Appl Math & Comput, 117, 187207.
Stone, J. E., Phillips, J. C., Freddolino, P. L., Hardy, D. J., Trabuco, L. G., & Schulten, K. (2007).
Accelerating molecular modeling applications graphics processors. J Comput Chem,
28(16), 26182640.
Sucan, I. A., & Kavraki, L. E. (2012). sampling-based tree planner systems complex
dynamics. IEEE Trans Robotics, 28(1), 116131.
Sun, Z., Hsu, D., Jiang, T., Kurniawati, H., & Reif, J. (2005). Narrow passage sampling probabilistic roadmap planners. IEEE Trans Robotics, 21(6), 11051115.
Tama, F., & Sanejouand, Y. H. (2001). Conformational change proteins arising normal
mode calculations. Protein Eng, 14(1), 16.
Tama, F., Valle, M., Frank, J., & Brooks, C. L. (2003). Dynamic reorganization functionally
active ribosome explored normal mode analysis cryo-electron microscopy. Proc Natl
Acad Sci USA, 100(16), 93199323.
Tang, X., Kirkpatrick, B., Thomas, S., Song, G., & Amato, N. (2005). Using motion planning
study rna folding kinetics. J Comput Biol, 12(6), 862881.
Tang, X., Thomas, S., Tapia, L., Giedroc, D. P., & Amato, N. (2008). Simulating rna folding kinetics
approximated energy landscapes. J Mol Biol, 381(4), 10551067.
Tanner, D. E., Phillips, J. C., & Schulten, K. (2012). GPU/CPU algorithm generalized
born/solvent-accessible surface area implicit solvent calculations. J Chem Theory Comput,
8(7), 25212530.
Tapia, L., Tang, X., Thomas, S., & Amato, N. (2007). Kinetics analysis methods approximate
folding landscapes. Bioinformatics, 23, i539i548.
Tapia, L., Thomas, S., & Amato, N. (2010). motion planning approach studying molecular
motions. Commun Inf Sys, 10(1), 5368.
Teknipar, M., & Zheng, W. (2010). Predicting order conformational changes protein
conformational transitions using interpolated elastic network model. Proteins: Struct Funct
Bioinf, 78(11), 24692481.
Tenenbaum, J. B., de Silva, V., & Langford, J. C. (2000). global geometric framework nonlinear dimensionality reduction. Science, 290(5500), 23192323.
Teodoro, M., Phillips, G. N. J., & Kavraki, L. E. (2003). Understanding protein flexibility
dimensionality reduction. J Comput Biol, 10(3-4), 617634.
Thomas, S., Song, G., & Amato, N. M. (2005). Protein folding motion planning. J. Phys. Biol.,
2(4), 148.
Thomas, S., Tang, X., Tapia, L., & Amato, N. M. (2007). Simulating protein motions rigidity
analysis. J. Comput. Biol., 14(6), 839855.
Thorpe, M. F., & Ming, L. (2004). Macromolecular flexibility. Phil. Mag., 84(13-16), 132331137.
Torella, J. P., Holden, S. J., Santoso, Y., Hohlbein, J., & Kapanidis, A. N. (2011). Identifying molecular dynamics single-molecule FRET experiments burst variance analysis. Biophys J,
100(6), 15681577.
570

fiC OMPUTATIONAL REATMENTS B IOMOLECULES ROBOTICS -I NSPIRED ETHODS

Tsai, C., Kumar, S., Ma, B., & Nussinov, R. (1999a). Folding funnels, binding funnels, protein
function. Protein Sci, 8(6), 11811190.
Tsai, C., Ma, B., & Nussinov, R. (1999b). Folding binding cascades: shifts energy landscapes.
Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 96(18), 99709972.
Uversky, V. N. (2009). Intrinsic disorder proteins associated neurodegenerative diseases.
Protein Folding Misfolding: Neurodegenerative Diseases, Vol. 14 Focus Structural
Biology, pp. 51885238. Springer.
van den Bedem, H., Lotan, I., Latombe, J.-C., & Deacon, A. M. (2005). Real-space protein-model
completion: inverse-kinematics approach. Acta Crystallogr, D61(1), 213.
van der Maaten, L. J. P., Postma, E. O., & van den Herik, H. J. (2009). Dimensionality reduction:
comparative review. J Mach Learn Res, 10(1-41), 6671.
Van Der Spoel, D., Lindahl, E., Hess, B., Groenhof, G., Mark, A. E., & Berendsen, H. J. (2005).
GROMACS: fast, flexible, free. J Comput Chem, 26(16), 17011718.
van Gunsteren, W. F., Billeter, S. R., Eising, A. A., Hunenberger, P. H., Kruger, P., Mark, A. E.,
Scott, W. R. P., & Tironi, I. G. (1996). Biomolecular simulation: gromos96 manual
user guide. http://www.gromos.net/.
Verlet, L. (1967). Computer experiments classical fluids. i. thermodynamical properties
Lennard-Jones molecules. Phys Rev Lett, 159, 98103.
Warshel, A. (2003). Computer simulations enzyme catalysis: Methods, progress, insights.
Annu Rev Biophys Biomol Struct, 32, 425443.
Warshel, A., & Levitt, M. (1976). Theoretical studies enzymatic reactions: Dielectric, electrostatic steric stabilization carbonium ion reaction lysozyme. J Mol Biol,
103(2), 227249.
Weber, J. K., Jack, R. L., & Pande, V. S. (2013). Emergence glass-like behavior markov state
models protein folding dynamics. J Amer Chem Soc, 135(15), 55015504.
Wells, S., Menor, S., Hespenheide, B., & Thorpe, M. F. (2005). Constrained geometric simulation
diffusive motion proteins. J Phys Biol, 2(4), 127136.
Xu, D., & Zhang, Y. (2012). Ab initio protein structure assembly using continuous structure fragments optimized knowledge-based force field. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 80(7), 1715
1735.
Yang, H., Wu, H., Li, D., Han, L., & Huo, S. (2007). Temperature-dependent probabilistic roadmap
algorithm calculating variationally optimized conformational transition pathways. J Chem
Theory Comput, 3(1), 1725.
Yang, L., Song, G., Carriquiry, A., & Jernigan, R. L. (2008). Close correspondence essential protein motions principal component analysis multiple HIV-1 protease structures elastic network modes. Structure, 16(2), 321330.
Yang, Z., Majek, P., & Bahar, I. (2009). Allosteric transitions supramolecular systems explored
network models: Application chaperonin GroEL. PLoS Comput Biol, 5(4), e1000360.
Yao, P., Dhanik, A., Marz, N., Propper, R., Kou, C., Liu, G., van den Bedem, H., Latombe, J. C.,
Halperin-Landsberg, I., & Altman, R. B. (2008). Efficient algorithms explore conformation
spaces flexible protein loops. IEEE/ACM Trans Comput Biol Bioinf, 5(4), 534545.
571

fiS HEHU & P LAKU

Zagrovic, B., Snow, C. D., Shirts, M. R., & Pande, V. S. (2002). Simulation folding small
alpha-helical protein atomistic detail using worldwide-distributed computing. J Mol Biol,
323(5), 927937.
Zhang, M., & Kavraki, L. E. (2002a). Finding solutions inverse kinematics problem
computer-aided drug design. Florea, L., Walenz, B., & Hannenhalli, S. (Eds.), Currents
Computational Molecular Biology, pp. 214215, Washington, D.C. ACM.
Zhang, M., & Kavraki, L. E. (2002b). new method fast accurate derivation molecular
conformations. Chem Inf Comput Sci, 42(1), 6470.
Zhao, G., Perilla, J. R., Yufenyuy, E. L., Meng, X., Chen, B., Ning, J., Ahn, J., Gronenborn, A. M.,
Schulten, K., Aiken, C., & Zhang, P. (2013). Mature HIV-1 capsid structure cryo-electron
microscopy all-atom molecular dynamics. Nature, 497(7451), 643646.
Zheng, W., & Brooks, B. (2005). Identification dynamical correlations within myosin motor
domain normal mode analysis elastic network model. J Mol Biol, 346(3), 745
759.
Zheng, W., Brooks, B. R., & Hummer, G. (2007). Protein conformational transitions explored
mixed elastic network models. Proteins: Struct Funct Bioinf, 69(1), 4357.
Zheng, W., & Doniach, S. (2003). comparative study motor-protein motions using simple
elastic-network model. Proc Natl Acad Sci USA, 100(23), 1325313258.
Zheng, W., Rohrdanz, M. A., & Clementi, C. (2013). Rapid exploration configuration space
diffusion-map-directed molecular dynamics. J Phys Chem B, 117(42), 1276912776.
Zheng, W., Rohrdanz, M. A., Maggioni, M., & Clementi, C. (2011). Polymer reversal rate calculated
via locally scaled diffusion map. J Chem Phys, 134(14), 144109.
Zhou, H. (2014). Theoretical frameworks multiscale modeling simulation. Curr Opinion
Struct Biol, 25, 6776.

572


